skip navigational links DOL Seal - Link to DOL Home Page U.S. Department of Labor Office of Administrative Law Judges Images of lawyers, judges, courthouse, gavel
www.oalj.dol.gov [skip navigational links] Search: ____________________ [go_button.gif]
December 9, 2003 DOL Home 
United States Department of Labor Office of Administrative Law Judges Law Library __________________________________________________________________
DICTIONARY OF OCCUPATIONAL TITLES (4th Ed., Rev. 1991) -- OCCUPATIONAL GROUP ARRANGEMENT __________________________________________________________________
TITLE PAGE HOW TO READ PARTS OF AN OCCUPATIONAL TITLE __________________________________________________________________
5 PROCESSING OCCUPATIONS 519.585-018 to 522.685-094
This category includes occupations concerned with refining, mixing, compounding, chemically treating, heat treating, or similarly working materials and products.
Knowledge of a process and adherence to formulas or other specifications are required in some degree.
Vats, stills, ovens, furnaces, mixing machines, crushers, grinders, and related equipment or machines are usually involved.
__________________________________________________________________
519.585-018 SAMPLE TESTER-GRINDER (mine 
Tends crushers, ovens, and screens to test samples of ore: Starts crusher to pulverize ore.
Removes ore from crusher and places it in oven to dry.
Sends portion of sample to laboratory for chemical analysis.
Places sample in vibrator containing magnets and water.
Starts vibrator to separate magnetic content of ore from impurities.
Drains water from vibrator and weighs magnetic remainder.
Pours ore sample through series of vibrating screens of different size openings to separate ore samples.
Weighs and records each size of ore.
Records number of tests performed.
May collect ore samples from various sites in plant or mine, and record origin of samples.
May perform chemical sedimentation or hardness tests on samples.
GOE: 05.12.07 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
519.663-010 DOOR-MACHINE OPERATOR (steel 
Operates machine equipped with door jack and coke guide to remove doors from discharge end of coke ovens and guide discharged coke from oven to quenching car: Drives machine along rails to designated oven.
Moves levers to hook machine arm onto door and remove it from oven, and to position frame which guides discharged coke from oven into quenching cars.
Signals PUSHER OPERATOR (steel 
Cleans fire clay and tars from door and jamb, using chisel bar.
Gathers dry clay and residue with shovel and wheelbarrow, and dumps it into hopper.
Replaces door.
May manually hook coke-guide hangers to oven and drop apron to oven sill.
May steam clean door machine.
GOE: 06.04.12 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
519.663-014 HOT-CAR OPERATOR (steel 
Drives electric car to haul hot coke from oven to quenching station and wharf: Positions dumpcar coupled to electric car below coke guide on designated oven.
Signals PUSHER OPERATOR (steel 
Moves car forward to distribute coke evenly in car.
Transports coke to quenching station, and starts equipment that sprays hot coke with measured amount of water.
Moves car to wharf, and turns air valve to open gates on car and dump coke on wharf.
Cleans cab and cab windows, using cleaning agents, broom, and brushes.
GOE: 06.04.40 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L2 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
519.663-018 PUSHER OPERATOR (steel 
Operates pusher machine which runs on rails at base of coke ovens, to push hot coke from ovens: Drives pusher to designated oven.
Moves levers to hook door arm to oven door and to remove it from oven, and to position ram.
Starts ram at signal from worker on discharge side of oven to push coke out of oven.
Withdraws ram and replaces door in oven.
Moves leveling bar back and forth through opening near top of oven to level fresh charge of coal.
Signals LARRY OPERATOR (steel 
Cleans pusher, using steam hose.
GOE: 06.04.12 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L2 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
519.664-010 ASSEMBLY CLEANER (smelt. 
Removes pot crust and carbon from spent anode assemblies, and cast-iron thimbles from contact rods, using crushing press, handtools, and power tools: Secures anode assembly to vibrating table, using hydraulic shaft and clamps.
Depresses pedal to activate vibration that shakes loose pot crust (cryolite), and breaks crust remaining on anode, using airhammer.
Sorts scrap aluminum from crust, and throws scrap in barrel.
Removes anode assembly from table.
Pushes pot crust from table into hopper of automatic crusher to prepare crust for reuse.
Observes machine and clears jams in hopper.
Breaks carbon or pot crust from contact rods, using hammer or airhammer.
Observes automatic thimble press that crushes and cracks cast-iron thimble formed around rod, and stops machine when malfunction occurs.
Examines assemblies on conveyor to detect damaged rods, and removes assemblies that need repair.
Removes cast iron reclaimed from rods for transfer to reduction furnace for remelting.
May be designated according to operation performed as Anode-Assembly Cleaner (smelt. 
II; Thimble-Press Operator (smelt. 
GOE: 06.04.24 STRENGTH: H GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
519.664-014 POT LINER (smelt. 
Relines pots and rebuilds continuous anodes used in reduction of aluminum by performing any combination of following duties: Replaces spacers, shunts, risers, brackets, straps, supports, and collector bars in pots, using wrenches.
Attaches cables to pot superstructure and signals OVERHEAD CRANE OPERATOR (any industry) 921.663-010 to lift it from pot.
Blows dust from top of anode, using air gun.
Cuts metal sheet to size, using shears or pneumatic cutter, bends it around stub of anode, and rivets it to casing.
Roughens top of stub, using fork, and pours carbon paste into form to build up anode to specified height.
Pours water into pot to loosen material.
Digs burned-out lining, insulation ore, bath material, and brick from interior of pot, using digger or jackhammer.
Lays brick base on pot floor and signals OVERHEAD CRANE OPERATOR (any industry) to dump carbon mix into pot.
Lines walls and floor with mix to specified depth, and tamps mix into cracks, using pneumatic hammer.
Reforms shell cavity with insulating board, masonite, plywood, or sheet metal.
Removes steel shell for repair, using hoist.
GOE: 05.10.01 STRENGTH: H GED: R3 M1 L2 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
519.665-010 GRANULATOR TENDER (steel 
Tends granulator machine that expands blast-furnace slag for use as building or insulating material: Signals OVERHEAD CRANE OPERATOR (any industry) 921.663-010 to position iron runners that carry slag from furnace to granulator machine.
Opens gate of furnace to allow slag from furnace to flow onto runners, and turns water, air, and steam valves to spray slag in granulator.
Positions container under discharge chute of granulator to receive expanded slag, using car puller.
Starts conveyor that carries expanded slag from granulator to discharge chute.
Stops equipment and clears slag from runners, granulator, and conveyor, using iron bar.
Lubricates equipment, using grease gun and oilcan.
GOE: 06.04.10 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
519.665-014 STANDPIPE TENDER (steel 
Tends equipment that regulates flow of byproduct gases in coke-oven standpipes preparatory to discharging or charging oven: Moves controls to regulate flow of gases to collecting main, to open standpipes and oven charging holes, clear oven and standpipe of gases, and control flow of ammonia liquor and steam during charging.
Sweeps spillage into charging holes.
Cleans top of ovens, using broom and shovel.
Clears standpipe, nozzles, and charging holes, using chisel bar and drill.
Pokes coal from hoppers on charging car, using bar.
May hook chains to oven doors and use winch to raise or lower doors.
May loosen, unplug, and move tar in main, using bar [CHASER, TAR (steel 
GOE: 06.04.12 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
519.665-018 WET-PLANT OPERATOR (smelt. 
Tends equipment that recovers cadmium, lead sulfate, and zinc oxide from dust collected in precipitators: Signals OVERHEAD CRANE OPERATOR (any industry) 921.663-010 to dump dust into tank from which it is processed through series of sulfating tanks to precipitate and wash lead sulfate and cadmium.
Pumps washed liquor to another tank for treatment prior to recovery of zinc oxide.
Prepares lime solution and mixes it with zinc oxide liquor.
Titrates samples or tests solution for acidity and specific gravity, using hydrometer.
Distills cadmium in retort furnace.
GOE: 06.04.10 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
519.667-010 CARBON SETTER (smelt. 
Replaces carbon anodes of electrolytic cells used in processing aluminum or magnesium: Disconnects anode assembly from connector arm, using wrenches.
Signals OVERHEAD CRANE OPERATOR (any industry) 921.663-010 to lift burned anodes from pot and lower new anode assembly into pot.
Cleans connector arms, using sandblast hose.
Fastens anode rod to connector arm, and adjusts assembly to suspend anode in bath.
Breaks burnt carbon block from steel stubs, using sledgehammer, and unbolts steel stubs from copper rods, using wrench.
Shovels broken carbon into boxes, and loads rods and stubs on trailers for removal.
GOE: 06.04.34 STRENGTH: H GED: R3 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
519.667-014 LABORER, SOLDER MAKING (nonfer. metal)
Performs any combination of tasks involved in melting, refining, and pouring solder: Shovels scrap into furnace melting pots and adjusts fuel valves to regulate melting.
Skims off dross with ladle.
Plunges sieve box filled with potatoes to bottom of molten metal so that steam from charring potatoes agitates metal and brings additional dross to top.
Skims off remaining dross.
Ladles refined metal from pots to molds.
Removes cooled metal from molds and places it on handtruck.
Mixes tin, lead, or refined scrap solder in melting pots, as directed by SUPERVISOR, SOLDER MAKING (nonfer. metal).
Ladles new solder into pig molds or into troughs of solder-making table.
May cut bars into short lengths.
Ties bars into bundles and packs bundles for shipment or storage.
May charge lead and tin pigs into furnace melting pots, by hand or using overhead power hoist.
May weigh pigs preparatory to charging furnace, using scale.
May level machine that converts molten lead-tin alloys into powdered metal to process solder cream and be designated Solder Cream Maker (nonfer. metal).
GOE: 06.04.24 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
519.683-010 DROSS SKIMMER (smelt. 
Operates overhead crane to control perforated metal basket to skim dross from molten lead and to transfer lead from blast furnace to heated kettle: Moves levers to lower basket and skim off dross into barrel for salvage.
Attaches electrically powered pump to kettle and starts pump to transfer molten lead into kettle.
Starts powered stirrer that agitates lead.
Skims off sulfide dross into barrel, using crane.
Moves containers to salvage bin, using handtruck.
GOE: 06.04.10 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
519.683-014 LARRY OPERATOR (steel 
Operates larry (electric charging-car) to charge coal into coke ovens: Weighs empty larry on scale to obtain tare weight.
Opens chutes of storage bin to dump specified weight of coal into hoppers on larry.
Drives larry to ovens, and moves controls to position hoppers over open charging holes.
Pushes levers to drop thimbles (sleeves) into charging holes and to open slides in hoppers.
Pokes bar through opening in hopper to force coal into oven.
Records oven number, battery, date, mix of coal, and shift.
May move controls to lower and raise porcupine in open standpipe to clean walls.
May signal PUSHER OPERATOR (steel 
GOE: 06.04.40 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L2 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
519.684-010 LADLE LINER (foundry; smelt. 
Repairs and relines ladles used to transport and pour molten metals: Chips slag from interior lining of ladle, using hammer and chisel.
Mixes sand, clay, and water, using shovel to form refractory clay mud.
Patches lining where cracked or worn by covering lining with refractory clay and tamping it in place.
Chips out entire lining when beyond repair, using hammer and chisel.
Relines ladle with refractory clay, using trowel.
Dries and bakes new lining by placing inverted ladle over burner, building fire in ladle, or by using blowtorch.
Relines and shapes pouring spouts of ladles with fire clay.
May reline ladles with refractory brick.
May make stoppers for stopper-type ladle.
May brush graphite facing on lining.
GOE: 06.02.30 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
519.684-014 LEAF COVERER (smelt. 
Cleans and re-covers leaves of aluminum-ore filtering units, using overhead bridge crane and handtools: Opens filter units and removes filter leaves, using crane.
Strips worn covers from filter leaves, using knife and wire cutters.
Transports filter leaves from filter units into cleaning vats, using crane.
Cleans discharge neck of leaves, and swabs them with graphite paste.
Covers cleaned filter leaves with cloth, and replaces leaves in filter units, using crane.
GOE: 06.04.39 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
519.684-018 MOLD DRESSER (any industry) alternate titles: mold repairer
Removes residue, blemishes, corrosion, and similar defects from interior of molds, using handtools and power tools: Inspects interior surfaces of molds to locate pits and holes.
Positions molds for work, using hoist.
Repairs defects, using hammers, drills, chisels, routers, or grinding wheel.
Smooths interior of mold, using file, buffing wheel, emery paper, or steelwool.
May add metal to or remove metal from plates, rings, and molds, using welding equipment and files.
May reassemble molds after repairing.
May be designated according to type of mold repaired as Glass-Mold Repairer (glass mfg.).
GOE: 06.04.24 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
519.684-022 STOPPER MAKER (steel 
Assembles refractory stoppers used to plug pouring nozzles of steel ladles: Mixes specified amount of refractory mortar powder with water, using trowel or hoe. Fastens stopper head to rod with metal pin.
Spreads mortar on rod, using trowel, and slides brick sleeves over rod to form refractory jacket.
Tightens locknuts holding assembly together, using wrench.
Spreads mortar on jacket to seal sleeve joints.
Hoists stopper and rod assembly on drying rack and pushes rack in oven to dry mortar.
Pulls rack from oven and pushes it to storage area.
GOE: 06.04.30 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
519.684-026 TOOL REPAIRER (smelt. 
Repairs worn and damaged equipment and tools used by workers engaged in electrolytic refining of copper: Examines rubber boots and gloves and fills them with water to detect holes.
Mends holes with rubber patches.
Mends leaky metal buckets by soldering holes.
Grinds dull tools, such as picks, shovels, and scoops, using electrically powered emery wheel.
Replaces handles, hose, and other defective parts of tools and equipment.
Issues new or repaired replacements.
GOE: 06.02.32 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M1 L1 SVP: 5 DLU: 77
519.685-010 BRIQUETTING-MACHINE OPERATOR (smelt. 
Tends equipment to dry, mix, and compress copper fines into briquettes for use by smelter: Starts belt conveyors that automatically feed mixture from wet-bin hopper to heated rotary dryer.
Turns valve to set burner at specified temperature.
Tests moisture content of mixture by feeling with fingers.
Pulls lever to open discharge gate of heating chamber to admit mixture into pug mill.
Opens valve to add binding solution to obtain mixture of required consistency.
Turns valve to feed mixture into press to form briquettes.
Oils and greases equipment, using oilcan and grease gun.
GOE: 06.04.10 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
519.685-014 GROUT-MACHINE TENDER (smelt. 
Tends machine that forces mortar into spaces between firebrick and steel shell of taconite ore furnace: Inspects furnace to detect discoloration spots which indicate flaws in firebrick inner wall of furnace.
Shovels grout into reservoir of machine.
Attaches airhose to compressed air system and grout hose to nipple on shell of furnace with wrench.
Starts machine and observes pressure gauge to determine when space is filled.
Caps nipple welded onto furnace shell, using wrench.
May mix mortar, using electrically driven paddle wheel.
May dismantle and clean grout machine and equipment, using wrenches, water, and airhoses.
GOE: 06.04.10 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
519.685-018 KETTLE OPERATOR (smelt. 
Tends oil-fired kettles that melt and fume antimony to make antimony oxide: Charges antimony crystals into melting kettle with hoist, and fires burners.
Regulates temperature according to thermometer readings and color and appearance of metal.
Skims slag from surface of kettle.
Connects trough from melting to fuming kettle, and pours metal into trough by tilting kettle.
Heats metal to specified temperature to vaporize antimony which is drawn to baghouse and condensed as oxide dust.
Fills buggy with antimony oxide from hoppers, and weighs filled buggy on floor scale.
Empties buggy onto conveyor leading to rotating drum in which oxides from different charges are blended.
Transfers blended dust to conveyor leading to automatic bagging machine.
Determines antimony content by casting sample into rod of specified size, weighing it, and referring to standard chart.
GOE: 06.04.10 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
519.685-022 KETTLE TENDER I (smelt. 
Tends series of oil-fired kettles that refine lead: Charges kettle with lead in molten or pig form, and fires kettle.
Adds specified type and amount of reagent and agitates mixture to cause impurities, such as antimony, arsenic, bismuth, and tin to form into dross.
Skims dross off mixture, using ladle, shovel, or perforated dipper.
Throws zinc bricks into kettle and agitates mixture to desilverize lead.
Skims crust of silver and gold content into basket of press, and compresses dross with air-driven ram.
Pumps lead through reaction cylinder while chlorine is admitted to form zinc chloride slag.
Skims slag after completion of reaction as indicated by color of slag and molten metal.
Pours metal into molds or dips samples into cold water to prepare them for laboratory analysis.
May hook pot to crane and signal OVERHEAD CRANE OPERATOR (any industry) 921.663-010 to transfer lead from one kettle to another.
May crystallize zinc in water-cooled vacuum tank to remove zinc from desilverized lead.
May produce antimony crystals from antimonial lead by mixing prescribed reagents with molten metal in kettle, by skimming dross, and by cooling bath to specified temperature.
May be known according to specific duty performed as Desilverizer (smelt. 
GOE: 06.04.10 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M1 L2 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
519.685-026 MUD-MILL TENDER (smelt. 
Tends mill that mixes flue dust with water to settle it for shipment: Opens bin outlet allowing dust to fall into mixing mill.
Dislodges banked dust in bin by hammering sides.
Starts mill and opens valve of water spray.
Opens door of mill allowing moistened dust to fall onto conveyor belt leading to railroad car.
May distribute mixture evenly in car, using shovel.
GOE: 06.04.10 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L2 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
519.685-030 ROD-MILL TENDER (cement; smelt. 
Tends rod mills that grind ore, clinkers, and rock into fine particles: Starts mill and feed conveyors.
Turns valves to feed lime, water, starch, soda ash, and other materials into mill to make slurry.
Pushes button to start screw conveyor that separates coarse particles from slurry and returns them to mill for regrinding.
Obtains sample of ore or slurry in bucket for laboratory analysis.
Weighs sample on balance scales to determine density of slurry.
Turns valves to feed water into mill to obtain specified density of slurry.
Replaces worn rods in mill, using electric hoist.
May record operating time of rod mills and levels of materials in storage bins.
GOE: 06.04.08 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
519.686-010 LABORER, GENERAL (nonfer. metal)
Performs any combination of tasks to aid other workers in production of nonferrous metal products: Transfers boxes of metal scrap from work areas to storage areas, using handtruck, and records quantity and type of scrap transferred.
Dumps scrap metal into crusher that reduces bulk of metal.
Shovels metal scrap onto furnace conveyor to dry scrap preparatory to melting.
Dumps paste oil or fat into drum, adds water, and mixes solution, using steam hose, to prepare lubricant used in drawing tubes and rods.
Examines metal products for defects, such as dents, cracks, and scratches.
Taps dents from products, using mallet.
Feeds metal castings into automatic finishing machine that performs operations, such as reaming, stamping, and cleaning.
Scrapes carbon, dirt, and metal particles from interior surface of casting molds.
May be known according to specific duties performed as Chip-Crusher Operator (nonfer. metal); Chip Drier (nonfer. metal); Inspector (nonfer. metal) II; General Scrap Worker (nonfer. metal); Soap Worker (nonfer. metal).
GOE: 06.04.10 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
519.687-010 CELL PLASTERER (smelt. 
Seals opening around carbon anode, where it protrudes through cover of magnesium refining cell, to prevent leakage of chlorine gas and to secure anode in position.
Applies mixture of asbestos fiber or pulp and water or oil, using trowel.
GOE: 06.04.34 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
519.687-014 DUST PULLER (smelt. 
Rakes or scrapes flue dust from converter flues or hoppers into larry cars or screw conveyors for shipment to furnaces.
Breaks up packed dust with bar or pole, and hammers sides of hopper with mallet or bar to dislodge contents.
May drive larry car to furnace, and dump load into furnace.
May scrape dust into collecting hoppers.
May measure depth of dust in flue, using sounding chain.
GOE: 06.04.39 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
519.687-018 FLUX-TUBE ATTENDANT (nonfer. metal; smelt. 
Mixes flux for graphite tubes and replaces tubes and chemical supply tanks on aluminum remelt furnaces: Mixes silicon aluminum paint solution (flux) and dips ends of new graphite tubes into solution to coat them.
Transports tubes and tanks of chlorine and nitrogen to furnaces, using handtruck.
Turns valves to shut off flow of chlorine and removes tubes from furnace, using handtools.
Discards broken tubes and installs new ones.
Cleans usable tubes, using wire brush, and installs them to specified depth.
Installs replacement tanks of chlorine and nitrogen on furnace, using handtools, and adjusts valves until tank pressure and flowmeters reach specifications.
Records amounts of chemicals and tubes used for each furnace.
Tours furnace area to verify readings of pressure and flowmeter gauges and makes required adjustments.
GOE: 06.04.10 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M1 L2 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
519.687-022 FOUNDRY WORKER, GENERAL (foundry)
Performs any combination of following tasks in foundry concerned with melting metal, pouring metal into molds, removing castings from molds, dressing castings, moving foundry materials, and cleaning equipment and work areas: Moves sand, castings, flasks, or other materials about foundry by hand, using wheelbarrow or cart, or by loading them onto conveyor.
Assembles flasks, using wrench, bolts, and tap screws.
Waters and mixes sand, shovels sand into flasks, and compacts sand in flasks, using ramming tool.
Sprays binder on surface of sand molds and dries surface with blowtorch.
Fits together, clamps, and unclamps cope and drag on production line.
Weighs out specified amounts of materials for furnace charge, and loads charge into melting furnace.
Skims slag from surface of molten metal, using scoop.
Carries or pushes ladles of molten metal on monorail and pours metal into molds.
Installs and removes steel jackets and bands used to hold snap molds together during casting.
Breaks sand mold from finished casting, using bar or hammer.
Sorts castings into pairs or groups for assembly.
Pulls reinforcing wires from castings.
Directs high pressure stream of water onto castings to clean castings and remove cores.
Cleans castings, patterns, and flasks, using wire brush.
Removes gates, sprues, and other projections from castings with sledge, pneumatic hammer, power shear, or power hacksaw.
Breaks up used sand molds with bar, shovels sand into drying oven and sand-mixing machine, and sifts sand through motor-driven screen for reuse in new molds.
Breaks up slag, using hammer, and shovels it into buckets for removal to dump.
Chips out worn cupola and ladle linings, using bar.
Prepares plaster and relines ladle.
Sweeps and cleans work areas.
May be designated according to worker assisted or according to duty performed as Casting Carrier (foundry); Casting Sorter (foundry); Cupola-Tender Helper (foundry); Flask Carrier (foundry); Jacket Changer (foundry); Ladle-Liner Helper (foundry).
May be designated: Ladle Pusher (foundry); Mold Clamper (foundry); Mold-Closer Helper (foundry); Molder Helper (foundry); Molder Helper, Machine (foundry); Mold Stacker (foundry); Pattern Carrier (foundry); Pattern Cleaner (foundry); Sand-Screener Operator (foundry); Sand Shoveler (foundry); Sand Wheeler (foundry); Shake-Out Worker (foundry); Skimmer (foundry); Slag Worker (foundry); Sprue Knocker (foundry).
GOE: 06.04.32 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
519.687-026 LABORER, GENERAL (smelt. 
Performs any combination of following tasks as directed by workers engaged in crushing, sampling, smelting, refining, loading, and moving ore and other materials, and cleaning machines and equipment: Loads and unloads material from freight cars or trucks, manually or using hoist, conveyor, or handtruck.
Sifts and screens materials, using screen and shovel.
Fills sacks or barrels with materials, such as arsenic, nickel, and selenium.
Weighs materials, such as ore and scrap.
Shovels scrap into trucks and storage bins or sorts and stacks scrap.
Segregates and stacks castings, using tongs or hoist, and marks or stamps identifying codes on castings.
Flushes mud and sludge from cooling and circulating tanks, using water hose and scrapers.
Removes arsenic from kitchens, using cable-drawn scrapers.
Empties slag pans from furnace, using hoist.
Brushes cores with oil to prevent cores from cracking.
Hooks and unhooks charge boxes and scrap trucks, to and from overhead crane.
Cleans work area and delivers samples to laboratory for analysis.
May remove scrap metal and wood from conveyors that feed machines.
May spray firebrick with clay solution to reduce corrosive and abrasive action.
GOE: 06.04.40 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
519.687-030 MACHINE-CASTINGS PLASTERER (foundry)
Caulks machine castings, using putty knife or trowel: Measures out required amount of metallic plaster, and mixes it into paste of specified consistency.
Applies paste to surface of machine castings, filling cracks and blowholes and leveling rough spots, using putty knife or small trowel.
Allows putty to dry and sands plaster to smooth surface.
GOE: 06.04.33 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
519.687-034 RODDING-ANODE WORKER (smelt. 
Renews carbon anode assemblies used in electrolytic processing of aluminum by performing any combination of following duties: Removes carbon blocks from conveyor, using hoist.
Feeds steel stubs on conveyor through bath solution to coat them with graphite.
Positions pouring ring and steel stub on carbon block.
Tilts crucible to pour molten iron around stub to cast it to block.
Bolts copper rod to stub, using wrench.
Loads anode assemblies onto trailer for removal to potroom, using hoist.
Unbolts copper rod from steel stub embedded in disintegrated block.
Places stub in hydraulic press and pulls lever to break off unused portions of block.
Cleans and straightens stubs and rods, using chipping gun, disk grinder, and straightening hammer.
Chips iron splashings from poured blocks, using chisel and hammer.
Pushes buttons and pulls levers to activate and switch conveyors to move blocks or assemblies through assembly process.
GOE: 06.04.34 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
519.687-038 STOPPER-MAKER HELPER (steel 
Assists STOPPER MAKER (steel 
Mixes cement and fire clay with water to form refractory mortar.
Carries materials, such as rods, stopper heads, and sleeves, to work area.
Performs other duties as described under HELPER (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.04.30 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
519.687-042 TEST WORKER (foundry)
Obtains sample of molten metal from each furnace heat, using hand ladle or glass tube: Dips hand ladle or inserts glass tube into pouring ladle, before molds are poured.
Pours molten metal into sand mold or allows it to solidify in glass tube.
Breaks or drills solidified metal to obtain test sample, using hammer or drill press.
Marks sample according to heat from which sample was taken.
GOE: 06.04.24 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
52 OCCUPATIONS IN PROCESSING OF FOOD, TOBACCO, AND RELATED PRODUCTS
This division includes occupations concerned with preparing food, tobacco, and related products for commercial use.
Includes manufacturing phases after harvesting and prior to marketing.
Such activities as slaughtering livestock, blending cheeses, fermenting alcohol, and smoking hams are included in this division.
Marking and packaging occupations are included here when they occur at the end of a production process.
520 MIXING, COMPOUNDING, BLENDING, KNEADING, SHAPING, AND RELATED OCCUPATIONS
This group includes occupations concerned with combining and mingling various materials to produce a single mass or compound and working an object or material by pressure and configuration to shape it or effect its texture and consistency.
520.132-010 BLENDING SUPERVISOR (grain-feed mills)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in blending various grades of flour into blends and mixing blends with cooking ingredients to prepare self-rising flour and premixes: Confers with plant management and other supervisors to plan daily production and coordinate blending department activities with other departments.
Inventories storage bins and packaging hoppers to determine priority of blends and availability of grades for blending.
Trains new workers.
Turns knobs on blending equipment to set blending meters for scheduled grades of flour to be produced.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.04.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M3 L3 SVP: 6 DLU: 77
520.132-014 SUPERVISOR, COMPRESSED YEAST (food prep., nec)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in pressing, mixing, and packaging bakers yeast: Trains workers in operation of machines.
Examines and feels yeast throughout process for color, consistency, and sharpness of breaking edge.
Observes progress of yeast through filter pressing, mixing, extruding, and packaging operations to ensure continuous workflow, conformity to specifications, and sanitary conditions.
Prepares and submits requisitions for materials and supplies.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M3 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
520.136-010 BLENDING SUPERVISOR (tobacco)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in feeding tobacco leaves onto blending conveyor: Plans daily work schedules based on analysis of work orders and inventory of tobacco in storage area.
Assigns workers to feed tobacco of different grades into conveyor to achieve specified blend.
Instructs individual workers to adjust rate of feeding based on hourly poundage and blending report.
Compiles reports to show daily production and departmental labor cost by grade.
Confers with plant officials and other supervisors to coordinate flow of tobacco through department.
Trains new workers.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.04.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M3 L3 SVP: 5 DLU: 77
520.137-010 SUPERVISOR, LUMP ROOM (tobacco) alternate titles: supervisor, rolling room
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in molding lumps, plugs, or twists of chewing tobacco: Reads production schedules for information, such as quantity of plugs or twists and type of blend and wrapper leaf specified.
Computes amount of filler and wrapper leaf required for production.
Examines plugs and twists to detect variations from standards.
Schedules cleaning and repairing of lump-making machines to avoid interruptions of production.
Coordinates receipt of tobacco from casing and drying department and transfer of plugs to shipping department.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.04.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M3 L2 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
520.361-010 HONEY GRADER-AND-BLENDER (food prep., nec) alternate titles: honey liquefier
Grades honey according to type, color, bouquet, and moisture content, and blends various grades to obtain uniform product: Compares samples of liquid honey lots with standard samples for color and bouquet, and ascertains moisture content, using refractometer.
Calculates amount of various types of honey for mixing to produce product of uniform color, clarity, and bouquet.
Directs other workers in dumping and blending of various honey lots in warming chamber.
May grade and mark honeycomb sections according to government regulations.
GOE: 06.01.04 STRENGTH: S GED: R4 M3 L3 SVP: 6 DLU: 77
520.362-010 BULK-PLANT OPERATOR (sugar 
Controls equipment in bulk sugar plant to load and unload sugar and to blend sugar syrups according to formula: Signals drivers or engineers by hand to give directions in positioning trucks and railroad cars for unloading.
Positions conveyors and attaches unloading hoses and pipes to truck and railroad cars.
Opens conveyor gate and pipe valves and starts pumps, blowers, and conveyors to unload sugar from vehicle and to transport it to storage bins.
Starts pumps and agitators to transport and mix specified amounts of water, corn syrup, and sugar in blending tanks.
Dumps bags of diatomaceous earth into blend and pumps mixture through filter to remove impurities.
Tests syrup to measure acid, yeast, and soluble sugar content, using pH meter and refractometer.
Keeps records of test results, weight of sugar received and shipped, amount and type of syrup blended, and percentage of wasted materials.
May weigh truck before and after loading.
May tend steam boiler to supply steampower to plant equipment [BOILER OPERATOR (any industry)].
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M3 L3 SVP: 5 DLU: 77
520.362-014 DRY-STARCH OPERATOR (grain-feed mills)
Operates machines and equipment to mix cornstarch blends: Signals STARCH-TREATING ASSISTANT (grain-feed mills) to admit starch suspension into mixing and storage tanks, and to dump measured amount of chemicals into mixing tanks to prepare chemical solutions.
Reads meters and turns valves to admit chemical solutions into blending tank.
Manipulates switches and turns valves to regulate heaters and agitators that mix solutions, and to pump starch mixtures into blending and filter tanks.
Receives or draws samples of product and performs standard tests to ascertain if acidity, alkalinity, and viscosity conform to specifications, using hydrometer and other test equipment.
Records quantity and kind of chemicals used.
Inspects equipment and observes gauges, thermometers, and meters to maintain efficient production.
May direct workers engaged in regulating filters, shakers, centrifugal driers, and related equipment to produce dry starch products.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R3 M2 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
520.382-010 CISTERN-ROOM OPERATOR (beverage) alternate titles: cistern-room working supervisor; subwarehouse supervisor
Controls regauging equipment from panelboard to reduce proof of newly distilled liquor in cistern tank before barreling: Reads charts to ascertain proof of liquor to be regauged, number of gallons to be regauged, and number of gallons of deionized water required to produce liquor of specified proof.
Pumps specified number of gallons of liquor and deionized water into cistern tank.
Opens valves to admit compressed air and agitate mixture.
Reads thermometer and alcohol-proof hydrometer during process and compares readings with standard gauging manual to determine final proof of liquor.
Pumps liquor into filling tanks for barreling or into railroad tank cars for shipment.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M2 L3 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
520.382-014 LIQUID-SUGAR MELTER (sugar 
Controls equipment to blend granulated sugar and water to produce liquid sucrose of specified concentration: Reads job order to ascertain type and amount of liquid sucrose specified.
Opens water and steam valves to fill tank and heat water to specified temperature.
Reads chart to ascertain amount of sugar required for producing liquid sucrose of specified concentration.
Starts pneumatic conveyors and opens valves to fill hopper with specified amount of sugar.
Opens hopper gate to feed sugar into heated water.
Starts agitators to mix liquid sucrose in tank for specified period.
Closes steam valve and allows liquid to cool.
Pumps liquid sucrose from mixing tank to specified storage tank.
Records operating data in station log.
Takes samples of liquid sucrose produced for laboratory analysis.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
520.384-010 BENCH HAND (bakery products) alternate titles: baker, bench; dough molder, hand
Forms dough for bread, buns, and other bakery products: Rolls dough to desired thickness with rolling pin or guides dough through rolling machine.
Sprinkles flour on dough and workbench to prevent dough from sticking.
Kneads dough to eliminate gases formed by yeast.
Cuts dough into pieces with knife or handcutter.
Adds spices, fruits, or seeds when making special rolls or breads.
Weighs pieces on scales and keeps record of production.
Places dough in baking pans.
May cut dough into bun divisions by machine.
May form dough into special shapes and add fillings or flavorings.
GOE: 06.02.28 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 6 DLU: 77
520.385-010 MIXER, WHIPPED TOPPING (food prep., nec)
Tends machines that mix and blend ingredients to make whipped topping for use on desserts: Weighs prescribed amounts of raw materials, such as oil, water, sugar, and caustics.
Adjusts thermostat for specified temperature in mixers and pumps or dumps ingredients into tank of mixer.
Admits prescribed quantities of water and other ingredients into mixing tank at specified intervals.
Tests solution for specified acidity, using pH meter.
Pumps mixture into blending tank and adds flavoring prior to pasteurization.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M2 L2 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
520.387-010 BLENDER (tobacco) alternate titles: granulating blender; leaf blender
Selects various grades and kinds of tobacco, to produce specific blend, according to formula and knowledge of tobacco characteristics: Removes leaves or hands of tobacco from hogsheads or bins, sorting tobacco according to texture, color, variety, and locality grown.
Feeds specified amount of various grades and types of tobacco onto conveyor, or places tobacco in baskets, boxes, or piles for processing.
GOE: 06.03.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
520.462-010 DOUGH-MIXER OPERATOR (bakery products) alternate titles: control-panel operator
Controls semiautomatic equipment, from control panel, to blend ingredients for bread and deposit specified quantity of dough in baking pans: Notifies other workers to admit broth into feedlines and to start loading specified size pans onto conveyor.
Turns handwheel to adjust conveyor guides to size of pans.
Starts flour sifter, premixer that blends ingredients, and developer that kneads dough, working from remote control panel.
Observes dials and recording instruments to verify temperature of broth, viscosity of dough, and speed of mixing units.
Feels dough emerging from developer to ascertain that consistency meets plant standard.
Turns developer speed control to specified setting and starts divider blades that pinch off and drop dough into pans passing on conveyor.
Turns handwheel and control bar to adjust discharge aperture above divider blades so that dough is uniformly shaped and deposited in center of pan.
Weighs sample pieces of dough and turns divider speed handle to regulate amount of dough deposited in pans.
Records temperatures, viscosity, and feed rate from instrument readings.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M1 L3 SVP: 5 DLU: 77
520.485-010 FLOUR MIXER (grain-feed mills) alternate titles: mixer-and-scaler; mixer operator
Tends machine that mixes flour and ingredients, such as buttermilk solids, phosphate, salt, soda, and sugar, to produce self-rising or other premixed flour: Dumps specified amount of flour into mixer or turns dial to convey measured amount into mixer.
Weighs and dumps other ingredients, such as buttermilk solids, phosphate, soda, and sugar, according to formula, and starts machine.
May record amount of ingredients in each batch.
May be designated according to type of flour mixed as Self-Rising-Flour Mixer (grain-feed mills).
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M2 L2 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.485-014 GRAIN MIXER (grain-feed mills) alternate titles: grain blender
Tends equipment to mix grain for milling into blended flour: Starts belt conveyor and adjusts valve controls on automatic feeders to regulate proportions of specified grades of grain flowing from storage tanks onto conveyor.
Starts conveyors to transfer grain to milling department.
May inspect grain for smut, rust, or other contamination.
May find weight of minimum test bushel by filling standard measure with grain and recording weight.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.485-018 MINCEMEAT MAKER (can.
&
Tends equipment to mix ingredients used in preparing mincemeat: Weighs and measures ingredients, such as raisins, currants, ground orange peels, salt, spices, and hot water, using platform scale and measuring containers.
Dumps ingredients from measuring containers into kettle and activates agitator to mix ingredients for specified period of time.
Turns valve to permit ingredients to flow from kettle into cooling trough preparatory to canning.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
520.485-022 REFINED-SYRUP OPERATOR (sugar 
Tends equipment that blends, inverts, and cools edible sugar syrups according to production schedules: Opens valves and starts pumps to move specified amounts of syrups and inverting materials from storage to mixing tanks.
Calculates proportions of ingredients when blending syrups other than standard.
Conducts light tests to determine viscosity and color of syrup, using refractometer and polariscope.
Bottles samples of products for laboratory analysis.
Opens valves to route and distribute syrups to tank cars or trucks.
Maintains production and distribution records.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M3 L3 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
520.485-026 SYRUP MAKER (beverage) alternate titles: cooker, syrup; sauce maker
Tends equipment to mix ingredients that produce syrups used in canned fruits and preserves, flavorings, frozen novelty confections, or non-alcoholic beverages: Determines amounts of ingredients, such as sugar, water, and flavoring, required for specified quantity of syrup of designated specific gravity, using sugar concentration and dilution charts.
Opens valve to admit liquid sugar and water into mixer, or dumps crystalline sugar into mixer and admits water.
Adds flavoring ingredients and starts mixer to make syrup.
Opens valve to admit steam into jacket of mixer to invert sugar, eliminate air, and sterilize syrup.
Tests syrup for sugar content, using hydrometer or refractometer.
Pumps syrup to storage tank.
May filter syrup to remove impurities and be designated Syrup Filterer (beverage).
May blend raw syrups and be designated Syrup Blender (beverage).
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M2 L3 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
520.485-030 STARCHMAKER (grain-feed mills)
Tends equipment to separate starch from ground potatoes, and adds chemicals to resulting solution to produce starch of specified purity: Flushes shaker screen containing ground potatoes, using water hose, to remove foreign matter and form crude starch suspension.
Turns valves to admit suspension and water to settling and rewash tanks in which impurities rise to surface, forming scum.
Turns valves to transfer scum (brown starch) to starch tables and settling tanks until all white starch has been separated.
Drains salvaged starch into vat, starts agitator, and adds equal volume of water to form white starch suspension prior to drying.
Determines acidity, viscosity, and bacteria content of suspension, using pH meter and viscometer.
Adds measured amounts of specified chemicals to further purify and preserve product.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M2 L3 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
520.487-010 CHEESE BLENDER (dairy products)
Prepares charts of quantities, grades, and types of cheese required for blending to make cheese products: Feels, tastes, smells, and observes cheese for firmness, mellowness, acidity, and color, and selects cheese products for specified blend.
Calculates quantities of cheese required for each batch, according to formula, and records quantities, grades, and types on chart.
Compares laboratory reports with specifications and alters calculations to achieve specified body, texture, flavor, moisture, fat, acidity, and salt in finished product.
GOE: 06.01.04 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M4 L3 SVP: 6 DLU: 77
520.487-014 FORMULA-ROOM WORKER (dairy products)
Prepares, bottles, and sterilizes infant formulas: Weighs or measures and mixes specified quantities of ingredients, such as evaporated, condensed, or powdered milk, food supplements, sugar product, soy product, and prepared meat base, using scales, graduated measures, spoons, and electric blender.
Computes number of calories per fluid ounce of formula from information on labels of ingredients, and records information on gummed label and places on bottles.
Pours formula into bottles, seals with nipple, protector cap, and collar, and places in autoclave for prescribed length of time to sterilize, or affixes hermetically sealed protector caps and places in commercial retort for sterilization and cooling.
Removes sterilized bottles from autoclave and stores in refrigerator or removes bottles from retort after cooling process and packages for delivery.
Washes and sterilizes empty bottles and unused nipples and caps.
May be known according to specific duties performed as Formula Bottler (dairy products); Formula Maker (dairy products).
GOE: 05.10.08 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M2 L2 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
520.487-018 PANTRY WORKER (sugar 
Assembles, weighs, and measures candy ingredients, such as egg whites and butter, according to formula: Selects batch formula cards in accordance with type of batch scheduled.
Weighs dry ingredients on scales and pours liquid ingredients into graduated containers.
Attaches formula card and identifying batch number to containers of measured ingredients for use by CANDY MAKERS (sugar 
Keeps record of batches produced.
May weigh ingredients, such as nuts, flavoring, extracts, condiments, and shortening that are not metered mechanically.
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
520.565-010 CHURNER (oils 
Tends one or more machines that churn processed shortening and margarine to obtain specified viscosity of mixture: Observes flow of stock in churner to avoid spilling.
Adjusts valves to control and direct overflow into reprocessing tank.
Starts machine to churn mixture, stops machine when specified viscosity is obtained, and opens valves and starts pump to transfer mixture.
Adjusts governor to regulate speed of pump that transfers product into packaging machines.
Collects and weighs sample of shortening at prescribed intervals to determine amount of nitrogen gas or air content in batch, using balance scale.
Notifies VOTATOR-MACHINE OPERATOR (meat products; oils 
Adjusts valves to keep specified temperature in churner.
Observes pressure and temperature gauges, and records readings.
Cleans equipment and lines, using pressurized steam and nitrogen gas.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.585-010 BLENDER (bakery products) alternate titles: bolter; flour mixer; mill operator
Tends machine that blends flour: Loads pallets with sacks of specified flour and transports them to blending machine, using truck.
Dumps flour from sacks into machine hoppers.
Holds sack over suction bag-cleaning device to remove remaining flour dust.
Starts blender and turns dials to regulate speed of screw conveyors that mix flour in prescribed ratios.
Records weights of flours blended.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.585-014 BROTH MIXER (bakery products) alternate titles: broth setter
Tends flour sifter and vats to mix fermenting, oxidizing, and shortening solutions, according to formula: Dumps flour from bins into sifting machine, using mechanical tipping apparatus or power chain hoist.
Opens valve, meters specified amount of water into fermenting vats, and adjusts thermostat to heat water to specified temperature.
Measures or weighs yeast food, milk solids, salt, sugar, and enrichment ingredients, according to formula, and dumps ingredients into vats.
Starts vat agitators and adds yeast at specified period to ferment solution.
Opens valves and starts pumps to run solution through heat regulator to dough-mixing machine.
Measures specified amounts of oxidizing solution and liquid shortening and dumps them into holding tanks.
Keeps record of time and temperature readings.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
520.585-018 COOLER TENDER (sugar 
Tends mixing tanks and cooling equipment that blend unslacked lime with molasses for extraction of sugar and monosodium glutamate: Turns valves and starts conveyor to fill cooler vat with specified amount of molasses and lime.
Starts agitator and cooling system.
Reads dials and gauges on panel control board to ascertain temperature, alkalinity, and density of mixture, and turns valves to obtain specified mixture.
Opens valves and starts pump to pump mixture to filter station.
Records data, such as volume of lime and molasses used, temperature, alkalinity, and density on report form.
May be designated according to machine operated as Vortex Operator (sugar 
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
520.585-022 LIQUID-SUGAR FORTIFIER (sugar 
Tends mixing tanks to fortify sugar liquid extracted from beets with concentrated sugar liquids to obtain standard sugar liquor: Starts pumps and mixing tank agitators and opens valves to fill mixing tank with thin sugar juice and concentrated sugar liquid.
Tests density of sugar liquor, using hydrometer.
Pumps liquids into tank until specified density of liquor is obtained.
Takes sample of liquor for laboratory analysis.
Records operational data.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M2 L2 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
520.585-026 SPICE MIXER (food prep., nec) alternate titles: spice blender
Tends mixing machine that blends spices: Weighs out each variety of spice required and pours or shovels them into hopper of machine.
Starts machine to mix spices to specified consistency.
Pulls lever to tilt machine and dump mix into container or storage bin.
May sift spices before mixing, using mechanical sifter.
May compare color of mixture with standard color chart to ensure color meets specifications.
When mixing tea, may be designated Tea Blender (food prep., nec).
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.587-010 PRETZEL TWISTER (bakery products)
Twists round strips of dough to form into pretzels: Picks piece of dough from conveyor and holds one end between thumb and forefinger of each hand.
Flips dough into loop, and crosses and presses ends to outer circumference.
Arranges pretzels on tray for baking.
Records number of pretzels twisted.
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.662-010 NOODLE-PRESS OPERATOR (food prep., nec)
Operates machine to blend ingredients, and knead, extrude, and cut dough used to make noodles: Installs specified die in press, using handtools.
Adjusts press rollers to regulate thickness of dough, using micrometer and handtool.
Dumps premeasured quantity of eggs into tub, sets meter, and turns spigot to admit prescribed amount of water.
Starts beater to mix eggs and water for specified time.
Starts pumps to transfer mixture to mixing unit of press.
Opens hopper to admit flour into mixing unit and starts press to process mixture.
Turns screw to set speed of knives to cut product to specified length.
Patrols drying chambers and observes temperature and humidity readings recorded on charts for variation in drying procedure.
Reports chart deviations to production manager.
Records type of product, date, and time of entry and discharge of product from drying chambers.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M3 L2 SVP: 6 DLU: 77
520.665-010 MINGLER OPERATOR (sugar 
Tends minglers that mix raw sugar and affination (syrup) to prepare raw magma of specified density: Starts mingler and signals MELT-HOUSE DRAG OPERATOR (sugar 
Turns valve to start flow of affination into minglers.
Regulates speed of mingler and controls flow of affination to maintain magma at specified density and level in receiving tanks.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
520.665-014 MIXING-MACHINE OPERATOR (food prep., nec)
Tends machine that mixes compressed yeast with oils and whiteners preparatory to extrusion and packing: Signals worker to fill mixer with specified amount of compressed yeast.
Pours specified quantity of cutting oils and whitening agents into yeast and starts agitators to mix ingredients for specified time.
Observes and feels mixed yeast to determine its consistency and pours specified amount of water into yeast to achieve required consistency.
Starts screw conveyor to transfer yeast to extruders.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.665-018 STARCH-TREATING ASSISTANT (grain-feed mills)
Tends mixing and blending tanks, and auxiliary equipment to assist in preparing starch blends from raw starch suspensions: Dumps specified amount of chemicals into mixing tank to prepare chemical solutions.
Observes signals from DRY-STARCH OPERATOR (grain-feed mills) and pushes or pulls switches, and turns valves to start pumps, heaters, and agitators, and to admit raw starch and chemical solutions into blending tanks.
Draws samples of mixtures for testing.
Monitors thermometers, meters, and gauges, to ensure that filters, shakers, centrifugals, and driers are operating efficiently.
Reports equipment malfunctioning to DRY-STARCH OPERATOR (grain-feed mills).
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
520.682-010 BLENDING-PLANT OPERATOR (oils 
Controls equipment to weigh and mix vegetable oils for products, such as salad oils, shortening, and margarine, according to formula: Opens valves to pump oils from storage tanks to scale tank.
Weighs oils and pumps specified quantity of each oil into blending tank.
Draws off sample of mixed oil and examines it for texture and color.
Sends sample to laboratory for chemical analysis.
Turns valves to make adjustments to blending process according to results of tests.
Pumps mixed oil to storage tanks.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M3 L2 SVP: 5 DLU: 77
520.682-014 CENTER-MACHINE OPERATOR (sugar 
Sets up and operates machine that extrudes soft candy, such as fondant, to form centers of specified size and shape for bonbons and chocolates: Inserts die plate in machine and tightens thumbscrews to secure plate.
Examines and feels candy for specified consistency.
Dumps candy into machine hopper.
Starts machine that automatically feeds candy through openings in die plate and cuts off and deposits formed pieces on conveyor, or moves control to force candy through openings in die plate and moves wires that cut extruded candy to specified thickness.
Weighs formed pieces at random to determine adherence to specifications.
Adjusts wire or knife that cuts extruded candy to specified dimensions.
When making cream centers to be coated with chocolate, may synchronize speed of center machine with enrobing machine.
May be designated by product formed as Fondant-Puff Maker (sugar 
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 5 DLU: 77
520.682-018 EXTRUDER OPERATOR (grain-feed mills)
Operates dough-mixing-and-extruding press to produce cereal products in form of letters, pellets, or other shapes: Cleans and installs perforated metal disk, containing openings of various shapes, in mixer.
Attaches blade, using wrench, that sweeps around disk, shearing off extruded dough as it is forced through holes.
Moves controls to set temperature of water, start flow of flour, water, and other ingredients into mixer, and regulate pressure forcing dough through extrusion die to maintain specified moisture content, color, and consistency of dough.
May operate extruding press only, when mixing is performed by another worker.
May be designated by form of extruded product as Pellet Operator (grain-feed mills).
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 5 DLU: 77
520.682-022 GUM-SCORING-MACHINE OPERATOR (sugar 
Operates one or more machines that roll chewing gum into sheets and score (partially cut) sheets to specified size: Turns handwheels to adjust rollers, knives, and scoring blades on machine to regulate thickness of sheet gum and depth of scoring, according to specifications, using ruler.
Starts scoring machine and flow of gum from mixer into hopper of machine.
Measures width, length, and thickness of scored sheets to ensure conformance to specifications, using ruler.
Examines sheets for scoring defects and completeness of sugar coating.
May give directions to other workers engaged in loading and unloading scoring machine and coating gum with sugar.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M2 L1 SVP: 5 DLU: 77
520.682-026 MOLDING-MACHINE OPERATOR (sugar 
Sets up and operates machine to mold soft candies, such as gumdrops, orange slices, and jellies: Installs $T3mold-printing board$T1 in machine and tightens thumbscrews or inserts wedges to secure it.
Observes thermometer and turns steam valve to maintain specified temperature in candy-melting hopper.
Opens valve or starts pump to fill hopper of depositing unit with fluid candy.
Starts machine and turns handwheels to synchronize flow of candy from depositing spouts with speed of mold board as it passes beneath spouts for filling.
Weighs formed candy for adherence to specifications and regulates spouts to increase or decrease flow accordingly.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M2 L3 SVP: 6 DLU: 77
520.682-030 SPINNER (sugar 
Operates machine that rolls or spins hot plastic candy into rope-like strip ready for cutting: Kneads hot candy into cylindrical shape on steam-jacketed pouring plate with gloved hands.
Turns water and steam valves to regulate temperature of plate.
Actuates heating unit of batch roller and starts machine.
Lifts candy from pouring plate and feeds candy between machine rollers.
Pushes lever to reverse action of rollers to stretch and compact candy to required size strip.
May feed strip, discharged from batch roller, into cutting machine.
May make specified types of hard candy, performing combination of duties, such as flavoring or coloring batch; spreading soft-center mixture, such as peanut butter, jam, or paste onto partially set candy; pulling candy prior to rolling and spinning [CANDY PULLER (sugar 
May control battery of machines that automatically pump soft centers into candy, roll or spin candy, size rope candy, cut it to specified size, and pass it through cooling conveyor for wrapping and packing.
When preparing rolls of jelly-centered coconut candy, may be designated Coconut-Jelly Roller (sugar 
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 6 DLU: 77
520.682-034 CRACKER-AND-COOKIE-MACHINE OPERATOR (bakery products) alternate titles: machine captain
Operates machine to roll dough into sheets and to form crackers or cookies, preparatory to baking: Turns crank to adjust space between rollers.
Selects and installs stamping or extruding die unit in machine, using wrench.
Pushes trough of dough to machine and shovels dough into hopper or dumps it into hopper, using hoist.
Starts machine and inserts end of dough from hopper into roller.
Observes operation and removes malformed cookies or crackers.
Verifies weight of samples against standards, using balance scale.
Scoops such ingredients as salt, sugar, and nuts into hoppers located along conveyor belt.
May be designated according to machine operated as Bar-Machine Operator (bakery products); Drop-Machine Operator (bakery products); Rotary-Machine Operator (bakery products); or according to product formed as Fig-Bar-Machine Operator (bakery products); Matzo-Forming-Machine Operator (bakery products).
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 5 DLU: 78
520.684-010 ALMOND-PASTE MOLDER (sugar 
Colors, kneads, and forms almond paste into decorative shapes, such as fruits and flowers: Adds specified amount of coloring to batch of almond paste and kneads it to distribute coloring uniformly.
Rolls paste into sheets or cuts pieces from lump of paste and molds into decorative shapes, using fingers.
May affix trimmings, such as artificial leaves and stalks, and form designs, using fingers or pronged instrument.
May paint molded products with edible coloring, using brush.
GOE: 06.04.32 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L2 SVP: 5 DLU: 77
520.684-014 ROLLER I (sugar 
Kneads soft candy into rolls, cuts rolls into slices, and shapes slices into centers for bonbons or other candies: Dusts worktable with powdered sugar to prevent adherence of candy to table.
Kneads slab of soft candy into roll and cuts roll into slices of specified size.
Shapes slices to form centers for coated candies.
May dump rolls of candy into hopper of machine that automatically cuts and shapes centers, or feed rolls into machine that slices them into loaf-shaped sections.
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
520.685-010 BATTER MIXER (bakery products) alternate titles: mixing-machine attendant
Tends machine that mixes ingredients to produce batter for cakes and other bakery products: Positions mixing bowl under mixer and attaches water hose.
Selects and installs beater in mixer, according to type of batter being produced.
Observes meter and moves lever to admit specified amount of water into bowl.
Dumps preweighed ingredients into bowl.
Starts machine, turns cranks, and sets dials to regulate speed and mixing time.
Feels texture of batter to judge desired consistency.
Weighs batch of batter to ensure conformance to weight specifications.
May mix dough.
May be designated according to type of batter mixed as Cake-Batter Mixer (bakery products); Doughnut-Batter Mixer (bakery products); Wafer-Batter Mixer (bakery products).
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
520.685-014 BATTER MIXER (food prep., nec) alternate titles: batch mixer
Tends machine that mixes ingredients to prepare batter for ice cream cones: Dumps required number of sacks of sifted flour into mixer.
Measures or weighs out specified amounts of other ingredients, such as sugar, coloring, water, and baking soda and pours them into mixer.
Starts mixer and opens valve to transfer batter from mixer to storage tanks.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M2 L2 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.685-018 BLENDER-MACHINE OPERATOR (oils 
Tends blending machine that mixes salt with coarse-grained margarine to produce finished product: Weighs specified amount of kneaded margarine and shovels it into open top of blender.
Adds specified amount of salt.
Starts paddle of blender to mix ingredients.
Tips mixing bowl and shovels margarine into handtrucks.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.685-022 BLENDER, SNUFF (tobacco)
Tends machine that blends cut leaf tobacco, toasted tobacco stems, and sweetener preparatory to being ground into snuff: Hauls tubs filled with tobacco or stems to work area.
Raises side of tub and rakes tobacco and stems into hopper of blending machine.
Weighs and dumps specified amount of sweetener into hopper.
Starts machine and regulates speed of conveyor.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.685-026 BLENDING-LINE ATTENDANT (tobacco)
Tends conveyors and machines that blend various types and varieties of tobacco with domestic blends of tobacco: Starts conveyors to move continuous flow of tobacco under blenders (revolving spikes) to feeders that add specified types of tobacco, through ordering cylinder, overflow scales, and onto final blending belt.
Sets timers to control blending and feeding speeds and sets flow scales to control amount of tobacco fed, following specifications.
Forks specified tobacco into feeder at intervals, to obtain desired blend.
Observes flow of tobacco and operation of conveyors and machines to ensure efficient operation.
Records weight of each lot processed.
May be designated according to type of tobacco processed as Turkish-Line Attendant (tobacco); Virginia-Line Attendant (tobacco).
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
520.685-030 BLENDING-TANK TENDER (beverage; can.
&
Tends equipment to blend citrus fruit juices: Opens valves to permit juices to flow from extractor machines to holding tanks.
Fills blending tanks with required amounts of specified juices.
Turns on mechanical agitators in blending tanks to mix contents, and pumps mixture to deoiling and pasteurizing machines.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M1 L2 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.685-034 BRINE-MIXER OPERATOR, AUTOMATIC (can.
&
Tends machine that mixes water and salt to prepare brine solution for use in preserving or separating food products: Turns valves to transfer solution from mixing machine to storage or separator tanks.
Tests specific gravity of solution with hydrometer and adds water or salt to bring solution to specified density.
May clean machinery and equipment, using steam hose, soap, and brushes.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.685-038 CAKE FORMER (oils 
Tends machine that forms cooked oilseed meats into cakes prior to oil extraction: Places cloth on cake-forming tray and presses lever or pedal to position charging buggy (hopper) over tray.
Releases oilseed onto tray and folds ends of cloth over oilseed meats.
Lowers head (metal block) into position over tray containing meats, and pulls lever to raise tray against head and form oilseed meats into cake.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.685-042 CAKE STRIPPER (oils 
Tends machine that removes cloth wrapper from pressed cottonseed cake: Inserts end of cloth in which cottonseed cake is wrapped into slotted shaft of cake-stripping machine.
Presses pedal to revolve shaft that strips cloth from cake.
Places cake onto conveyor for further processing.
GOE: 06.04.19 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.685-046 CANDY PULLER (sugar 
Tends candy-pulling machine or kneads candy by hand to impart specified flavor, color, and consistency to candy preparatory to spinning and cutting: Kneads and pulls batch of candy.
Adds specified amount of coloring and flavoring agents and continues kneading until coloring and flavoring are uniformly distributed and candy feels hardened enough to withstand machine pulling.
Hangs kneaded ribbon of candy on hooks of pulling machine and starts machine that pulls candy until it feels sufficiently hardened to retain specified consistency after spinning and cutting.
May be designated according to candy pulled as Taffy Puller (sugar 
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 5 DLU: 77
520.685-050 CANDY-MAKER HELPER (sugar 
Tends candy making machines that mix candy ingredients: Weighs, measures, mixes, and dumps specified ingredients into cooking utensils.
Opens discharge valve, and starts pumps or tilts cooker or kettle to pour cooked candy onto tables or into beaters.
May form soft candies by spreading candy onto cooling and warming slabs, cut candy by hand or with machine knife, cast candy in starch or rubber molds, or by machine that extrudes candy.
May form hard candies by hand or machine-pulling or spinning.
Washes kettles, cookers, machines, and equipment after each batch.
Performs other duties as described under HELPER (any industry) Master Title.
May be designated according to type of candy mixed or cooked as Caramel-Candy-Maker Helper (sugar 
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M2 L1 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
520.685-054 CASING-FLUID TENDER (tobacco) alternate titles: flavoring maker
Tends vats, tanks, and pumps to mix, store, and transfer flavoring ingredients for use in making casing fluid: Pumps liquid from tank car to holding tanks and from holding tanks into vats for mixing.
Adds specified amount of powdered flavoring to liquid in vat and admits steam to vat to blend liquid and powdered ingredients.
Pumps mixture into aging tanks or to casing machine storage tanks.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
520.685-058 CASTING-MACHINE OPERATOR (dairy products)
Tends machine that forms, cools, and cuts process cheese into slices of specified size and weight: Places forming die into manifold of cheese hopper.
Starts refrigerant pump and observes thermometer to cool conveyor to specified temperature.
Starts and sets speed of cheese pump which forces cheese through openings in manifold to form ribbons of cheese of specified width and thickness.
Threads ribbons of cooled cheese through stacking rolls which pile them on top of each other.
Observes lighted panel buttons which indicate off-weight cheese stacks going through automatic cutter, weigher, and counter.
Alters speed of cheese pump or presses button to automatically reset speed of conveyor to obtain specified weight cheese.
Places cheese stack on scale to test accuracy of automatic weigher.
Stops machine to clear jams.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M2 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
520.685-062 CASTING-MACHINE OPERATOR (sugar 
Tends machine that forms sugar decorations for cakes: Fills machine hopper with prepared sugar mixture.
Places sheet of paper on machine bed under die.
Turns handwheel on machine to force mixture through die to form decorations on paper sheet.
Places filled sheet on rack for transfer to packing department.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.685-066 CHOPPING-MACHINE OPERATOR (meat products)
Tends machine that chops and mixes ground meat into emulsion for use in making such products as bologna, meat loaves, sausages, and wieners: Dumps ground meat and premixed seasonings into chopping machine, using fork or hoist, or pulls lever to raise hopper and turns valve to feed meat trimmings into chopping machine.
Pours designated amount of premixed seasonings and water or ice into chopping machine to season, moisten, and obtain specified temperature of mixture.
Starts machine to mix emulsion to specified consistency.
Stops machine and pulls lever to lower center core of mixing bowl and discharge emulsion into pan or truck.
Scrapes emulsion from bowl.
May push truck filled with emulsion to stuffing machine.
May grind meat [MEAT GRINDER (meat products)].
May add ingredients, such as pickles, olives, and pimentos to emulsion.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
520.685-070 CHURN OPERATOR, MARGARINE (oils 
Tends equipment that mixes and churns ingredients to produce margarine: Turns valves to admit preweighed ingredients, such as milk, water, and oil, into mixing vat.
Weighs or measures additives, such as emulsifier, preservatives, salt, and vitamins, according to formula, using scale or graduate.
Dumps additives into mixing vat.
Starts agitator that blends and emulsifies ingredients.
Observes temperature gauge and adjusts steam valve to maintain specified temperature in vat.
Stops agitator after specified period of time, and turns valve to transfer ingredients to cooling unit.
May pasteurize milk [PASTEURIZER (oils 
May harden emulsion [VOTATOR-MACHINE OPERATOR (meat products; oils 
May test milk for acidity.
May disassemble and clean stock lines, and change filtering apparatus.
May mix ingredients for vegetable shortening and be designated Shortening Mixer (oils 
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M2 L2 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.685-074 COCOA-POWDER-MIXER OPERATOR (sugar 
Tends machine that mixes dry ingredients to make cocoa blends and dairy powder mixes: Weighs out specified amounts of ingredients, such as sugar, powdered milk, and cocoa, according to formula, and dumps ingredients into mixing machine.
Starts machine that mixes ingredients for specified length of time.
Opens machine valve and starts conveyor to transfer mixed batch to storage.
Collects sample of completed mix for laboratory analysis.
May add ingredients and remix batch, according to laboratory recommendation.
May be designated according to product mixed as Dairy-Powder-Mixer Operator (sugar 
May tend panel-controlled conveyorized system that transfers measured amounts of ingredients from respective bins to continuous mixing machine and be designated Quick-Mixer Operator (sugar 
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
520.685-078 CONFECTIONERY-DROPS-MACHINE OPERATOR (sugar 
Tends one or more machines that extrude chocolate or nonchocolate confectionery mixture through die plate onto conveyor to form such products as stars, chips, or sheets: Attaches specified die plate to machine, using handtools.
Starts machine and observes action to ensure that confection is forming according to standards.
May clamp metal bar to bed of conveyor to form mixture into sheets.
May be designated according to design of product as Chocolate-Drops-Machine Operator (sugar 
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.685-082 COOKER, CASING (tobacco) alternate titles: flavor maker
Tends heated vats to mix and cook tobacco casing fluid ingredients: Admits steam into jacket of vat.
Dumps solid ingredients into vat and pours liquids from pail or turns valve to admit liquids, following written or oral instructions.
Starts agitator in vat or stirs mixture with paddle to mix ingredients and prevent them from boiling over.
Starts pump or removes bung from bottom of vat, after mixture is cooked into syrup, to transfer casing fluid to storage tanks.
May measure specific gravity of fluid, using hydrometer, and add water, according to consistency of mix.
May weigh or measure cooked ingredients.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
520.685-086 DIVIDING-MACHINE OPERATOR (bakery products) alternate titles: roll-dough divider; roll-machine operator
Tends machines that automatically divide, round, proof, and shape dough into units of specified size and weight, according to work order, preparatory to baking: Presses buttons and turns dials or handcranks to start machines and to adjust capacity of dividing compartments and speed of feeding conveyor on dividing machine.
Weighs units of dough, using balance scale, and adjusts machine when units vary from standard.
Scoops flour or starch into sifters which automatically dust units of dough to prevent sticking.
Observes progress of units of dough through machines that automatically round, proof, and shape dough.
Turns rheostats to control speed of proofing and molding machine conveyors.
Inspects shaped units of dough as they are ejected into pans from molding machine and discards misshapen units.
May place dough in pans by hand, position pans in racks, and push racks to holding area for proofing.
May fill reservoir of automatic feeding device with seeds, such as sesame, caraway, and poppy seeds, when processing buns.
May be designated according to machine tended as Molding-Machine Operator (bakery products).
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 79
520.685-090 DOUGH-BRAKE-MACHINE OPERATOR (bakery products)
Tends machine that kneads dough to desired texture: Sprinkles roller and catching apron of machine with flour to keep dough from sticking.
Starts machine and turns handwheels to adjust distance between rollers.
Cuts off lump of dough in trough and inserts dough between rollers.
Catches dough as it extrudes from machine and reinserts it at different angles until texture reaches desired consistency.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
520.685-094 FEED BLENDER (grain-feed mills)
Tends agitator tubs that blend ingredients used in making stock feed: Turns valves to admit measured amounts of materials, such as bran, gluten, and steep water into tubs, and starts paddle agitators.
Feels sample of mixture to determine if feed consistency meets plant standard.
Pulls lever to open sliding gate and drain mixture from tubs.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.685-098 FEED MIXER (grain-feed mills) alternate titles: batch-mixer operator; feeder operator; mash-feed-mixer operator
Tends machines that mix stock or poultry feed according to formula and conveys it to packing machine or storage: Dumps specified number of sacks of meal, mash, grain, and meat scrap into machine hopper, or presses buttons on control panel to transfer individual ingredients from separate bins to batch scale hopper until specified weight of each ingredient is obtained.
Weighs additives, such as minerals and vitamins, and dumps them into hopper.
Starts machine to mix ingredients, and starts elevators and conveyors to transfer feed to storage tanks or packing machine hoppers.
May match color of mix with standard sample by adjusting automatic feeder controls to regulate amount of ingredient in mix.
May adjust nozzles, rheostat, or steam controls to spray heated molasses onto feed.
May record weight of feed mixed or ingredients used.
May be designated according to type of feed mixed as Dairy-Feed-Mixing Operator (grain-feed mills); Poultry-Feed-Mixer Operator (grain-feed mills); or according to ingredient mixed with feed as Limer (grain-feed mills); Molasses-Feed Mixer (grain-feed mills).
May tend machines that automatically weigh out specified amounts of mash and grain prior to mixing with ingredients and be designated Feeder Operator, Automatic (grain-feed mills).
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M2 L2 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.685-102 FLAKING-ROLL OPERATOR (grain-feed mills) alternate titles: flake-or-shred-roll operator; roll operator
Tends machine containing rolls that form cooked grain into flakes, shredded biscuits, or other shapes to produce cereal products: Moves controls to start pairs of rollers rotating and to convey cooked grain to roll feeders.
Turns dials and handwheels to adjust pressure of rollers to maintain specified thickness and consistency of formed product, as indicated by feel and visual inspection, and to control rate of feed of grain through feeding mechanism.
Replaces worn knives used to scrape formed grain from roller surface, using handtools.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
520.685-106 FLOUR BLENDER (grain-feed mills) alternate titles: blender
Tends machines that blend and sift flour, and conveyors that carry flour between machines: Starts screw conveyors or turns valves on feed chutes to transfer flour from storage bins to mixing machine, or dumps designated bags of flour into hopper of machine.
Starts machine to mix flour and pulls lever to open gate and allow blended flour to flow from machine.
Starts separator that sifts mixed flour to remove lumps.
Starts conveyors that transfer blended and sifted flour to packing machine.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
520.685-110 GREEN-COFFEE BLENDER (food prep., nec) alternate titles: coffee blender
Tends machines that blend various grades of green coffee beans: Transfers sacks of specified grades of green coffee beans to dumping chute, using handtruck.
Empties beans onto chute.
Starts machine that mixes coffee beans.
Pulls levers to dump mixed coffee beans into elevators that convey them to cleaning and storage areas.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M1 L2 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.685-114 ICING MIXER (bakery products) alternate titles: filler mixer
Tends equipment that mixes ingredients for icing or filling bakery products: Weighs and measures ingredients, such as sugar, chocolate, food coloring, and pulped or ground fruit or nuts, according to recipe.
Dumps ingredients into mixing bowl.
Selects and installs beater arms in mixing machine, using wrench.
Turns dials and pushes buttons to set mixing time, temperature, and speed to start machine.
Pours measured amount of water from container into mixing bowl, and adds additional ingredients, as necessary, during mixing cycle to ensure that icing or filling meets company standards.
Observes and feels texture of mix to determine when desired consistency has been obtained.
May cook some types of icings or fillings in steam-jacketed kettles.
May mix meringue for pie topping.
May be designated according to product mixed or cooked as Cooker, Pie Filling (bakery products); Fruit Mixer (bakery products); Pie-Filling Mixer (bakery products).
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R3 M1 L2 SVP: 3 DLU: 78
520.685-118 KETTLE TENDER (sugar 
Tends machine that mixes chewing gum base with powdered sugar: Places spout of vibrating hopper, containing powdered sugar, in top of mixing machine and starts vibrator and mixer.
Places container on scale under spout of centrifuge machine and opens valve to allow specified amount of gum base to fill container.
Positions container over mixer and opens discharge valve to allow gum base to flow into mixer.
Dumps gum requiring reprocessing into mixer to mix with new batch.
May substitute glucose syrup for powdered sugar.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.685-122 LOZENGE-DOUGH MIXER (sugar 
Tends machine that mixes formulated ingredients, such as sugar, syrup, and flavoring to make dough for candy lozenges: Weighs and measures ingredients according to formula, and dumps specified quantity of ingredients into trough of mixing machine.
Starts machine that kneads and mixes ingredients, forming dough.
Examines and feels mixture for specified consistency and to determine need for additional ground sugar or other ingredients.
Scoops lozenge mixture onto tray for further processing.
May be designated according to product mixed as Kiss Mixer (sugar 
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M2 L2 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
520.685-130 MASH GRINDER (dairy products)
Tends mill and agitating vat that grind and mix flour and malt with water, to make malted milk mash: Turns water valve to fill vat and starts grinder and agitator.
Transfers flour and malt from storage silo by moving microswitch controls to deposit specified amounts through automatic scale hopper into mill or by placing counters on meters and starting conveyors that carry measured amounts through grinder into vat.
Observes ammeter, and grain and water meters to detect deviations from specifications, and moves levers to alter grain and water flow.
Pumps mash to mash kettles.
May heat mash by mixing steam with water.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M2 L2 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.685-134 MILL FEEDER (grain-feed mills)
Tends machine that mixes meat scraps, used in poultry feed, into uniform mixture: Starts machine and opens slide gate in hopper to feed scraps into machine.
Observes meter and adjusts slide gates in feed hopper to regulate flow of material into machine.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.685-138 MIXER (food prep., nec)
Tends automatic grinding and blending machine to prepare condiments, such as dry and liquid salad dressing mixes, spaghetti sauce mix, garlic spread, and seasoning salts: Weighs out and measures ingredients, such as spices, oils, cheese, and salt.
Dumps ingredients into hopper of machine and turns valve to admit specified amounts of liquid ingredients into hopper.
Moves controls to adjust speed of grinding rollers.
Sets thermostats to maintain specified temperature.
Starts machine to mix ingredients for predetermined period.
May transfer ingredients from storage to work area, using lift truck.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M2 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
520.685-142 MIXER OPERATOR II (chemical)
Tends machine that mixes specified amounts of additives and raw salt to fortify salt products, such as table salt, salt tablets, and block salt: Weighs out specified amounts of additives, such as potassium iodide, magnesium carbonate, garlic, and spices, using scale, and dumps them into drum of mixer.
Starts automatic weighing machine that weighs out prescribed amount of salt.
Moves levers to transfer salt from scales to mixing drum and starts mixer.
Pushes lever to open bottom of mixer and discharge mixed product into packing bins or into feed hopper of tablet compressor.
May tend vibrating screens to size salt crystals.
May be designated according to product for which salt is mixed as Mixer Operator, Raw Salt (chemical); Mixer Operator, Tablets (chemical); Mixer Operator, Vacuum-Pan Salt (chemical).
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.685-146 MIXER OPERATOR (beverage)
Tends mixer to produce powdered drink or food: Weighs and measures ingredients according to formula and pours them into mixers, or starts conveyor to move premeasured ingredients into mixer.
Starts mixer to mix ingredients for specified time.
Compares color of mixture with color chart to ensure product color meets specifications.
Moves lever to dump mixture into container or onto conveyor.
May be designated according to product mixed as Gelatin-Powder Mixer (beverage); Soft-Drink-Powder Mixer (beverage).
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M2 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
520.685-150 MIXER OPERATOR (sugar 
Tends machine that mixes such ingredients as chocolate liquor, sugar, powdered milk, and cocoa butter preparatory to making sweet chocolate: Weighs and dumps dry ingredients into mixing machine by hand, hydraulic lift, or conveyor equipped with automatic scale.
Observes meters and turns valves to admit measured amounts of liquids into mixer.
Observes thermometer and sets thermostat to heat mixer to specified temperature.
Starts mixer.
Examines mixture to ensure that consistency conforms to standards.
Starts conveyor to transfer finished batch to refining machine.
May tend automatic sugar grinders or pulverizers [SUGAR GRINDER (sugar 
May be designated according to type of mixer used as Melangeur Operator (sugar 
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M2 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
520.685-154 MIXER-AND-BLENDER (food prep., nec)
Tends machine that mixes and blends food ingredients to produce such products as mayonnaise, mustard and salad dressing, and spices, according to formula: Weighs such ingredients as eggs, salt, spices, and sugar, using scale or weighing hopper.
Dumps ingredients into mixing machine.
Turns valves to permit measured amounts of such liquids as oil, water, or vinegar to flow from tanks into mixing machine.
Starts machine and observes mixing to ensure thorough blending.
Starts pumps to transfer contents of mixer to containers, filling machines, or storage tanks.
May grind dry ingredients, using grinding machine.
May be designated according to product mixed as Egg-And-Spice Mixer (food prep., nec); Mayonnaise Mixer (food prep., nec); Mustard Mixer (food prep., nec).
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
520.685-158 MIXER, CHILI POWDER (food prep., nec)
Tends machine that mixes chili powder with other spice ingredients for use as seasoning: Measures and weighs out specified quantities of ground chili peppers, garlic, salt, and other ingredients and dumps them into hopper of mixing machine.
Adjusts controls to regulate steam pressure in jacket of mixer and starts machine.
Compares sample of mixture with standard sample to ensure that mixture meets color and texture specifications.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M2 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
520.685-162 MIXER, DRY-FOOD PRODUCTS (food prep., nec)
Tends machine that mixes, blends, or kneads ingredients to make dry-food products, such as baking powder, gelatin desserts, pie thickeners, and ice cream powders: Weighs or measures ingredients and dumps them into mixer or opens valve to admit specified amounts of each ingredient into mixer from storage hopper.
Admits steam or coolant into jacket of mixer and sets thermostat to maintain temperature in mixer at specified level.
Regulates mixing time and speed for mixing, blending, or kneading, and starts machine.
May perform acidity tests, using pH meter or may submit samples to laboratory.
May add additional ingredients and remix batch on basis of test results or laboratory recommendation.
May start conveyor to transfer dry-food product to next process.
May be designated according to food product mixed as Baking-Powder Mixer (food prep., nec).
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M1 L2 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
520.685-166 MIXING-MACHINE OPERATOR (can.
&
Tends machine that mixes food ingredients for subsequent processing, canning, or freezing: Loads hopper of mixer with premeasured quantities of ingredients by hand, conveyor, bucket hoist, or by opening valves.
Starts mixer and observes operation to ensure thorough blending.
Pulls lever to tilt and empty mixer or uses scoop to empty mixture into chute, hopper, or container.
May weigh out and measure ingredients, using platform scale and measuring containers.
May observe and control conveyors and filling machines in processing line to ensure continuous operation.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.685-170 MIXING-TANK OPERATOR (oils 
Tends equipment that mixes ingredients for use in producing margarine: Turns valve to admit liquid ingredients, such as water or milk, into mixing vat.
Dips measuring stick into vat and closes valve when liquid reaches specified level.
Weighs specified quantities of dry ingredients, such as salt and powdered milk, and empties ingredients into vat.
Starts agitator to mix liquid and powdered ingredients for specified time.
Turns valve to empty mixed ingredients from vat for further processing.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M1 L2 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.685-174 MOLDER, MEAT (meat products)
Tends stuffing machine that fills molds with meat emulsion to form meat loaves: Slides mold under discharge nozzle of stuffing machine and moves lever to discharge emulsion into mold.
Removes filled molds and places them on racks for further processing.
May fill molds with meat cuts or whole pieces of meat by hand or using compressed air plunger and be designated Hand Molder, Meat (meat products).
May stuff bologna and canadian bacon into casings by hand.
May close ends of filled casings with metal clip and by tying with string.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.685-178 PELLET-MILL OPERATOR (grain-feed mills) alternate titles: feed-and-pellet operator
Tends machine that presses ingredients into feed pellets for poultry and stock feed: Turns steam valves to regulate temperature of machine.
Observes ammeter and turns valves to regulate flow of material to machine.
May adjust nozzles to regulate flow of molasses into ingredients and turn steam valves to regulate temperature of molasses.
May adjust flow of air to cool pellets in cooler.
May tend bucket elevator equipment to transfer pellets to storage.
May adjust rollers to crush pelletized feed into crumbles.
May mix poultry or stock feed preparatory to pelletizing [FEED MIXER (grain-feed mills)].
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.685-182 PRESS OPERATOR, MEAT (meat products)
Tends machine that presses such meats as bacon slabs, beef cuts, hams, and hog butts, into shape to facilitate slicing or packing: Positions meat on table of pressing machine and depresses pedal or pulls lever to lower ram onto meat that compresses meat into shape.
Removes meat from machine and places in container, or on conveyor for transfer to slicing machine.
May tend slicing machine [SLICING-MACHINE OPERATOR (dairy products; meat products)].
May be designated according to cut of meat pressed as Butt Presser (meat products); Ham Molder (meat products).
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.685-186 PRESS TENDER (food prep., nec)
Tends battery of presses that automatically mix ingredients, and knead and extrude dough for use in making macaroni products: Installs specified dies in presses, using handtools.
Sets automatic weighing device.
Opens valves to admit prescribed ingredients into mixing unit and turns dials that control rate of flow of material through processing units.
Starts machines that trim and rack extruded strands of long goods over drying sticks (rods) and convey them into preliminary drying chamber, or extrude short goods onto conveyor chutes leading to series of driers.
Observes presses in operation to ensure progressive movement of mixture.
Regulates speed of press to control product quantity.
Observes color of dough and feels its consistency to determine, from knowledge and experience, if product conforms to standard.
May be designated according to type press product as Press Tender, Long Goods (food prep., nec); Press Tender, Short Goods (food prep., nec).
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R3 M1 L1 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
520.685-190 PRETZEL-TWISTING-MACHINE OPERATOR (bakery products)
Tends machine that automatically rolls, cuts to size, and twists dough to form pretzels and conveys them to oven: Turns knobs to adjust machine to roll and cut dough to specified thickness and length.
Loads dough into machine hopper and starts machine.
Observes processing of dough through machine to detect broken or misformed pretzels.
Stops machine to clear jams.
May be designated according to type of pretzel formed as Pretzel-Stick-Machine Operator (bakery products).
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.685-194 RELISH BLENDER (can.
&
Tends machine that blends diced pickles with other ingredients to make relish: Weighs out specified quantity of diced pickles in barrel, using floor scales, and dumps pickles into blending tank, using automatic hoist.
Pumps cooked mixture of sugar, syrup, spices, and preservatives into blending tank.
Starts agitator in blending tank and observes process to ensure thorough blending.
Opens valve to transfer relish to bin for packing.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
520.685-198 ROLLING-MACHINE OPERATOR (sugar 
Tends machine that rolls slabs of candy to specified thickness prior to cutting: Turns handwheel to adjust clearance of rollers to accommodate thickness of slab without binding.
Starts machine and feeds slab of candy between rollers.
Reverses rollers to return candy for removal.
Readjusts rollers and continues operation until candy is rolled to specified thickness.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
520.685-202 SAUSAGE MAKER (meat products)
Tends machine that mixes ingredients, such as ground meat and condiments, to make sausage, according to formula: Weighs ingredients and dumps them into mixing machine.
Starts machine that mixes ingredients.
Empties mixed ingredients into containers.
May grind meat.
May fill casings with bulk sausage [BULK-SAUSAGE-STUFFING-MACHINE OPERATOR (meat products)].
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L2 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.685-206 SAUSAGE MIXER (meat products)
Tends machine that mixes ground meat and condiments to make bulk sausage: Shovels meat into bowl of mixing machine and adds specified amounts of seasonings.
Starts machine, observes thermometer, and adds water or ice to bowl to regulate temperature of mixture.
Moves lever to tilt mixing bowl and empty contents into cart.
Scrapes meat from bowl and mixing paddles.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M1 L2 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
520.685-210 STUFFER (meat products) alternate titles: sausage stuffer
Tends equipment that forces meat emulsion into casings to make meat products, such as linked sausages, frankfurters, and wieners: Lifts lid from compression cylinder and shovels meat emulsion into cylinder.
Tamps emulsion with shovel to remove air pockets and replaces lid.
Turns valve to admit compressed air into cylinder.
Slides casing over discharge nozzle and moves lever to discharge emulsion into casing.
Ties knot in end of filled casing, or seals casing with clipping device to prevent loss of emulsion.
May tend machine that automatically fills, links, and ties casings with wire band.
May feed filled casing into linking machine.
May tend stuffing machine that fills casings with bulk sausage and be designated Bulk-Sausage-Stuffing-Machine Operator (meat products).
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.685-214 SWEET-GOODS-MACHINE OPERATOR (bakery products) alternate titles: bench hand, machine; dough sheeter
Tends machine that automatically rolls (sheets), curls, and cuts sweet goods into specified size and weight preparatory to making rolls, coffee cake, and other sweet goods: Fills dispensing units of machine with such ingredients as oil, cinnamon, and sugar.
Adjusts valve to control sprinkling of ingredients on dough and starts machine.
Picks up dough from pan and sprinkles with flour.
Places dough on conveyor that feeds into sheeting rolls.
Observes progress of dough rolling, and stops machine to correct malfunctions.
May roll dough by repeated hand feeding through machine to obtain desired consistency.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
520.685-218 TRAY-CASTING-MACHINE OPERATOR (dairy products)
Tends conveyor-type casting machine that pumps process cheese into molds to form slices of specified size and weight: Places paper interleaves in dispenser and presses button to signal for cheese to be dropped into hopper.
Starts machine that automatically pumps measured amounts of cheese onto interleaves in trays, and spreads cheese into slices of specified size.
Observes weight-indicator light and moves lever to regulate amount of cheese deposited in tray.
Straightens interleaves, replaces clogged dispenser, or feeder needle, scrapes cheese from tamper and vacuum openings in tray, and removes malformed slices.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.685-222 TUMBLER TENDER (food prep., nec)
Tends machine to season potato chips, corn chips, or similar food products: Dumps food products into drum of machine and starts machine that rotates drum.
Scoops seasoning from barrel, using measuring cup, and sifts seasoning onto food product in drum.
Stops machine after specified time and tilts drum to dump material into container, onto conveyor, or into hopper of bagging machine.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.685-226 UNLEAVENED-DOUGH MIXER (bakery products)
Tends five-position mixing machine to mix unleavened dough ingredients, such as flour, eggs, salt, and water in production of matzoh products: Pushes mixing pot onto roller platform and positions pot under automatic filling and weighing devices.
Flips switch and turns controls to fill mixing pot with dough ingredients.
Observes scale indicators to determine when specified amounts of ingredients have been added.
Dumps premeasured pail of condiments into mixing pot.
Pushes pot from roller platform onto platform of mixing machine.
Depresses button to move platform to each of five mixing positions and to simultaneously agitate mixing fork in mixing pot.
Depresses foot pedal to uncradle mixing pot from final position, lifts and pulls pot onto roller platform, and pushes pot onto elevator for conveying to dough-dumping station.
Observes machine and auxiliary automatic pot-washing system, and stops machine and notifies supervisor when malfunctions occur.
Cleans mixer cover, using brush and airhose, and unscrews mixing fork from spindle for cleaning by other worker.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.685-230 MIXER OPERATOR, SNACK FOODS (food prep., nec)
Tends numerically controlled equipment that automatically mixes oil, water, and mixture of grain products to make dough used in production of snack foods: Reads chart to determine time intervals and sequence for adding oil and water and length of mixing cycle.
Pulls knobs to activate control panel and observes lights and dials to verify that panel is functioning.
Inspects sections of mixing equipment, such as agitator blades, drum of mixer, and feed hopper to verify that equipment is clean.
Adds emulsifier and contents of oil drum into reservoir prior to mixing process, using air-powered pump.
Selects and pushes wheeled container of preweighed mixture of grain products or dough scrap into automatic locking device of mixer elevator.
Presses specified buttons on control panel to purge air from oil and water lines, open drum door of mixer, raise and dump contents of container into mixer, and activate mixer.
Observes digital timer and presses buttons at specified intervals to add predetermined amounts of oil and water, stop mixing process, and dispense dough onto conveyor for further processing.
Observes oil and water pipes during mixing process to ensure that oil and water are flowing into mixer.
Feels dough on conveyor to detect defects, such as excessively dry, moist, or lumpy dough.
Scoops cup of dough from initial batch of mix for quality assurance testing.
Notifies supervisor of dough not meeting mixing standards and of equipment malfunction.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 86
520.685-234 DOUGH MIXER (bakery products) alternate titles: mixing-machine attendant
Tends machines and equipment that automatically mix ingredients to make straight and sponge (yeast) doughs according to formula: Moves controls and turns valves to adjust metering devices that weigh, measure, sift, and convey water, flour, and shortening into mixer, and that measure and dump yeast, vitamins, yeast food, sugar, salt, and other ingredients into mixing machine.
Turns knobs or dials to set mixing cycle time and maintain temperature of dough.
Starts machine.
Feels dough for desired consistency.
Positions wheeled dough trough in front of mixer, opens mixer door, and starts mixer to rotate blades and dumps dough into trough.
Pushes troughs of sponge dough into room to ferment for specified time.
Dumps raised sponge dough into mixer, using hoist, and adds ingredients to complete mixture.
Records number of batches mixed.
May weigh and measure ingredients which are manually fed into mixer.
May dump all ingredients into mixer by hand.
May be designated according to type of dough mixed as Bread-Dough Mixer (bakery products); Cookie Mixer (bakery products); Dog-Food Dough Mixer (bakery products); Doughnut-Dough Mixer (bakery products); Pastry Mixer (bakery products); Pie-Crust Mixer (bakery products).
May be designated: Cracker-Dough Mixer (bakery products); Pretzel-Dough Mixer (bakery products); Sweet-Dough Mixer (bakery products).
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R3 M3 L3 SVP: 5 DLU: 78
520.686-010 BALL-MACHINE OPERATOR (sugar 
Feeds automatic rolling machine that forms pliable candy into shapes, such as balls or disks: Applies colored candy strips onto outside of candy roll to form stripes.
Places bulk candy on heated canvas belt.
Rolls candy into ropelike shape.
Starts machine.
Feeds rolled candy into machine that cuts, rolls, cools, and drops shaped candy onto conveyor leading to wrapping department.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.686-014 DESSERT-CUP-MACHINE FEEDER (bakery products)
Feeds freshly baked wafers into machine that forms dessert cups: Positions and holds wafer over male die.
Withdraws hand as female die forces wafer over male die to form dessert cup.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.686-018 FEED-MIXER HELPER (grain-feed mills) alternate titles: feeder loader; hopper loader; mixer-machine feeder
Assists FEED MIXER (grain-feed mills) to prepare stock and poultry feed: Dumps sacks of wheat, corn, or other ingredients into hopper of mixing machine.
Stirs ingredients in hopper, using paddle to facilitate flow into mixer.
Performs other duties as described under HELPER (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.686-022 FLOUR-BLENDER HELPER (grain-feed mills) alternate titles: blender helper; bolter helper; flour-mixer helper
Fills hopper of blending machine with flour to assist FLOUR BLENDER (grain-feed mills): Moves sacks of flour from storeroom to blending machine, using handtruck, forklift, or electric hoist.
Cuts sacks open and dumps contents into hopper of machine, or turns hand screws or moves levers to adjust gate openings of overhead storage bins to release specified amounts of flour into blender hopper.
Performs other duties as described under HELPER (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.686-026 GLUCOSE-AND-SYRUP WEIGHER (sugar 
Weighs specified amounts of glucose and flavoring syrup for use in making chewing gum: Places container on wheeled scale and positions container under glucose tap.
Fills container with specified weight of glucose.
Adds syrup to glucose until prescribed weight of combined ingredients is reached.
Pours ingredients into mixing machine.
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: H GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.686-030 MOLDING-MACHINE-OPERATOR HELPER (sugar 
Feeds candy-filled starch molding trays onto conveyor or into feed rack of machine that empties trays, removes starch from candy, and deposits candy on trays or conveyor for packing and shipment.
Positions trays under machine to receive molded candy.
Stacks filled trays and transfers them to drying area, using handtruck.
May dump trays of candy into hopper of machine that shakes starch from candy and be designated Starch Dumper (sugar 
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.686-034 PLUG SHAPER, MACHINE (tobacco)
Feeds lumps of tobacco into shape cells of automatic press that compresses lumps into plugs of chewing tobacco.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.686-038 TAMALE-MACHINE FEEDER (food prep., nec)
Feeds machine that automatically encases ground meat mixture with cornmeal mixture to form tamales: Fills respective hoppers with cornmeal and ground meat mixture and presses button to start machine.
Removes formed tamales from conveyor, wraps tamales in corn husks, and packs them in plastic containers.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.687-010 BLENDER LABORER (tobacco)
Moves leaf tobacco loaded on dollies to blending line from storage room in tobacco processing plant: Observes workers feeding tobacco onto blending conveyor to determine when supply of tobacco needs replenishing.
Reads grade on card above worker and locates same grade in storage area.
Pulls dolly loaded with tobacco from storage into position along blending line, using hook.
Unties burlap sheet wrapped around tobacco, using pliers.
Removes sheets and dollies from work area.
GOE: 06.04.40 STRENGTH: V GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 1 DLU: 77
520.687-014 BLINTZE ROLLER (food prep., nec) alternate titles: cheese-pancake roller
Fills precut sheets of egg dough with cheese, folds ends over filling, and rolls lengthwise to make blintzes (rolled cheese pancakes).
Places blintzes on conveyor leading to packer.
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: M GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.687-018 CANDY MOLDER, HAND (sugar 
Pours liquid candy into chilled molds to form solid candy figures, such as animals or Christmas trees: Dumps or pours candy into warming pan and turns dial to heat product to pouring temperature.
Stirs candy to facilitate melting and pours it into chilled mold.
Taps or tilts mold to distribute candy uniformly throughout mold.
Opens mold when candy has congealed and removes figure.
May be designated by type of candy molded as Chocolate Molder (sugar 
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
520.687-022 CANDY SPREADER (sugar 
Pours and spreads batches of cooked candy, such as fudge, caramel, or toffee, in pans or trays, or onto temperature-controlled slabs preparatory to cutting: Covers pan, tray, or slab with wax paper, dusts lined pan with powdered sugar, or greases with shortening to prevent sticking.
Spreads candy to specified thickness, using spatula or roller.
May cut candy into sections, using knife, for use by CUTTING-MACHINE OPERATOR (sugar 
May roughen surface with scraper to simulate homemade candy or sprinkle chopped nuts or fruit over candy to decorate it.
When spreading and cutting bar candy, may be designated Candy Maker, Bar (sugar 
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: M GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.687-026 CASING-MATERIAL WEIGHER (tobacco) alternate titles: casing mixer; top flavor attendant
Weighs and measures ingredients used in making casing fluid, according to formula, using scales and measuring cans.
Adds or removes ingredients until specified amount is obtained and dumps or pours ingredients into cooking vats.
Opens containers in which ingredients are stored.
May assist COOKER, CASING (tobacco) in cooking ingredients.
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M1 L2 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.687-030 FILLER MIXER (tobacco) alternate titles: filler blender; scrap preparer
Mixes various types of cigar filler or plug filler tobacco: Weighs out specified amounts of each type of tobacco and dumps tobacco on floor.
Forks tobacco leaves together to obtain uniform mix.
Forks mixed leaves into storage bin.
May fill bags with blended filler tobacco.
May be designated according to type of filler tobacco mixed as Seed And Havana-Scrap Preparer (tobacco).
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.687-034 FOOD MIXER (grain-feed mills)
Mixes specified amounts of liquid and solid ingredients together to make bird foods.
Packs product into molds or containers.
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M2 L2 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.687-038 GUM PULLER (sugar 
Conveys lump chewing gum from mixer and dumps gum into hopper of machine that rolls and scores gum sheets: Positions cart under door of mixer.
Sprinkles sugar by hand over interior surfaces of cart to prevent gum from sticking.
Tilts mixing machine and opens door.
Pulls quantity of gum from mixer, cuts it with knife, and drops gum into cart.
Pushes cart into position over hopper of scoring machine.
Tilts rear of cart to dump gum into hopper, using electric hoist.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.687-042 HOP WEIGHER (beverage)
Weighs hops used in brewing beer: Selects bale of prescribed hops from storage area in hop room and transports bale to work area, using handtruck.
Opens burlap wrapping of bale, using knife.
Breaks bale into chunks and throws chunks into basket on platform scale.
Fills basket to prescribed number of pounds.
Wheels filled baskets to brew kettles.
GOE: 06.03.02 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L2 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
520.687-046 MEXICAN FOOD MAKER, HAND (food prep., nec)
Performs any combination of following tasks concerned with preparing and packaging Mexican ready-to-serve or frozen foods: Places portions of cooked foods on tortilla.
Rolls or folds tortilla over seasoned ground meat, bean, or cheese mixture to form Mexican food item.
May garnish food with cheese, peppers, olives, and other condiments.
May wrap tortilla around mixture to form characteristic shape and be known as Burrito Maker (food prep., nec).
May fill taco shell with meat and be known as Taco Maker (food prep., nec).
May encase cheese or meat mixture in tortilla and be known as Enchilada Maker (food prep., nec).
May spoon sauce and meat mixture onto tortilla shaped cornmeal dough and wrap product in corn husk or paper and be known as Tamale Maker (food prep., nec).
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.687-050 PLUG SHAPER, HAND (tobacco) alternate titles: shape hand
Compresses lumps of tobacco into plugs of chewing tobacco in hand shapes, performing any combination of following tasks: Greases sinkers to prevent lumps from sticking, using cloth saturated with liquid paraffin or petrolatum.
Places sinkers and frames into shape boxes and fills frame cells with specified number of lumps.
Positions filled shape box under ram of hydraulic press and turns valve to lower ram onto shapes that compress lumps into plugs.
Removes shape boxes from press and sinkers and frames from shape box.
Knocks plugs from frame cells, using rake or metal bar.
Stacks plugs on table for further processing.
Cleans tin plates in washing machine or with cloth and water.
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: M GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
520.687-054 SEASONING MIXER (meat products) alternate titles: spice mixer
Weighs and mixes seasonings, such as salt, pepper, and sage, according to formula, for use in making sausage: Mixes ingredients by hand or in machine.
Dumps mixture into containers and attaches tags or marks containers with identifying information.
May grind whole peppers in grinding machine.
May cube eggs, pimientos, and pickles, by placing them on cutter screen and lowering press to force them through cutters.
May peel and cut onions, using knife.
May clip one end of meat casings with clipping tool, and stamp date and code on casings and sausage containers, using rubber stamp.
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L2 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.687-058 SYRUP-MIXER ASSISTANT (grain-feed mills)
Empties sacks of ingredients, such as cane and beet sugar, into mixing vats preparatory to making table syrups.
Carries containers and materials and cleans vats, using steam hose, as instructed by SYRUP MIXER (grain-feed mills).
GOE: 06.04.40 STRENGTH: V GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.687-062 SPICE MIXER (can.
&
Weighs and mixes seasonings and other ingredients to prepare spice mixes, according to formula, for use in flavoring canned food products: Weighs specified ingredients, such as spices, salt, and flour, using scales.
Mixes ingredients, using mixing machine, spatula, or portable mixer.
Fills containers to specified weight with mix for use in canning process.
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M2 L2 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
520.687-066 BLENDING-TANK TENDER HELPER (can.
&
Assists BLENDING-TANK TENDER (beverage; can.
&
520.685-030 by directing filling of holding tanks and performing related duties: Pulls latch of lid-locking hinge or clips metal band holding lid on barrel of juice concentrate, using clippers, to remove lid from barrel.
Signals INDUSTRIAL-TRUCK OPERATOR (any industry) 921.683-050 by hand to guide lifting and positioning of barrel adjacent to opening of holding tank.
Manually holds barrel in contact with tank opening as barrel is tilted to dump juice concentrate into tank.
Sprays inside of barrel to wash remaining concentrate into tank, using hose.
Turns valve of holding tank as directed by BLENDING-TANK TENDER (beverage; can.
&
Cleans residue and film from equipment and floors following processing, using waterhose, cleaning solution, brushes, and rags.
GOE: 06.04.40 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 86
521 SEPARATING, CRUSHING, MILLING, CHOPPING, GRINDING, AND RELATED OCCUPATIONS
This group includes occupations concerned with setting apart materials in a mixture by filtering, sifting, straining, squeezing, precipitation, centrifugal pressure, or agitation, and breaking materials and reducing them to smaller size by compression, chipping, and smashing.
521.130-010 MILLER SUPERVISOR (grain-feed mills) alternate titles: miller, first; miller, head; mill operator
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in cleaning and grinding grain and in bolting flour to ensure milling, according to specifications.
Feels flour during processing and adjusts grinding rolls and other equipment to mill product to specifications.
Performs duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M2 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
521.130-014 SUPERVISOR, POWDERED SUGAR (sugar 
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in pulverizing and packing powdered sugar.
Inspects pulverizing station to verify that grinders are not overheating, load on electrical system is within specified limits, and dust collector system is operative.
Performs duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M3 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
521.131-010 SUPERVISOR, RICE MILLING (grain-feed mills)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in milling rice: Reviews instructions covering grade and amount of rice to be milled, and plans operations accordingly.
Issues instructions for adjusting shelling-stones, rice hullers, rice-cleaning machine, rice grader, rice polishing equipment, reel, scalping machine and other milling machinery.
Observes milling process, examines rice, and issues instructions for adjustment of machinery to maintain quality and quantity of product.
May inspect and repair machinery.
May plan installation of machinery.
Performs duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M2 L3 SVP: 6 DLU: 77
521.132-010 MILL PLATFORM SUPERVISOR (sugar 
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in grinding sugarcane in series of crusher mills to extract juice: Signals workers to regulate speed of conveyors and crusher rollers.
Pries cane loose from between rollers to break up jams, using wooden pole.
Adjusts tension of rollers to ensure total extraction of juice.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R4 M2 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
521.132-014 SUPERVISOR, THRESHING DEPARTMENT (tobacco)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers in threshing department of tobacco processing plant: Pushes buttons on control panels to start conveyors and machines.
Observes threshing machine units to detect jams and defective machine operations.
Removes clogged tobacco, using metal rod or hand, or diverts flow of tobacco to another processing line until jams have been corrected.
Feels tobacco to determine moisture content and turns valves to regulate flow of steam and water into ordering machine [ORDERING-MACHINE OPERATOR (tobacco)].
Keeps payroll timecards for subordinates.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.02.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M2 L3 SVP: 5 DLU: 77
521.137-010 SUPERVISOR, PICKING (tobacco)
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in removing offcolor tobacco, stem particles, and foreign matter from tobacco as it moves along belt conveyors: Observes conveyors to detect malfunctioning.
Observes activities of workers picking green and dark tobacco, stem particles, and foreign matter, such as string, dirt, and paper from tobacco to ensure that tobacco is processed, according to instructions.
Notifies maintenance department of major breakdowns.
Turns knob and moves lever to adjust feed chutes and equalize distribution of tobacco on conveyors.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.04.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M3 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
521.362-010 CONTINUOUS-ABSORPTION-PROCESS OPERATOR (sugar 
Controls continuous absorption process equipment to remove coloring from sugar beet juice and gas regenerating furnace to reactivate carbon (burn out impurities): Starts conveyors and elevators to fill absorption tank with activated carbon.
Opens valves and starts pumps to force sugar juice through carbon in tank.
Observes gauges and recorder readings on panelboard and adjusts controls to obtain constant flow of juice through tank.
Draws sample of juice and observes color for conformance to specifications.
Diverts flow of juice through standby tank when color of juice does not meet specifications.
Moves controls on panelboard to admit fuel and air into regenerating furnace, and presses button that automatically ignites fire in furnace.
Starts conveyors and feeders to convey carbon from tank into furnace that removes impurities in carbon.
Reads gauges and recorders and adjusts controls to regulate furnace temperature, fuel-air ratio, and feed rate of carbon into furnace.
Records operating data in station log.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
521.362-014 MILLER, DISTILLERY (beverage)
Controls equipment to clean and grind whole grain for use in production of distilled liquors: Inspects carloads of whole grain to detect presence of harmful insects, such as weevils and grain beetles.
Collects sample of grain from each carload for laboratory analysis.
Records number of boxcar from which each sample is taken.
Pumps whole grain from boxcars to storage tanks or hopper of cleaning machine, using air-conveyor chutes.
Starts automatic cleaning machine that blows and sifts foreign particles, such as dirt, twigs, and stones from whole grain and conveys clean grain to storage tank for further processing.
Pumps clean grain from storage tank into hopper balanced on scale and records weight of grain before dumping into grinding machine.
Starts grinding machine, and regulates flow of grain from hopper.
Pumps ground meal from grinding machine into scale-hopper to compute and record difference in weight of grain before and after grinding.
Pumps ground meal into meal tank for further processing.
Signals MILLER HELPER, DISTILLERY (beverage) to connect air-conveyor chutes to pumps and storage tanks, clean or change screens on cleaning machine, stop and start pumps, conveyors, and machines, and lubricate moving parts of machines and equipment.
Makes minor repairs and adjustments to pumps, air-conveyor chutes, and machines.
May be designated according to specific duties as Grain Miller (beverage); Grain-Cleaner-And-Transfer Operator (beverage).
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M3 L2 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
521.362-018 REFINERY OPERATOR (grain-feed mills) alternate titles: control board operator, sugar refining
Controls refinery equipment to produce sugar and sugar products from starch: Reads dials, meters, and gauges, and moves controls to adjust and regulate treating time, temperature, rate of flow and density of sugar liquors through filter and evaporator units.
Monitors panelboard to detect and correct equipment malfunctioning.
Records processing, control, and other production data in log.
Directs REFINERY OPERATOR, ASSISTANT (grain-feed mills) and FILTER TENDER (grain-feed mills) when emergency operation of equipment is manually required, or in operational assignments.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M3 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
521.365-010 CHAR-FILTER OPERATOR (sugar 
Tends bone-char filters to remove soluble impurities and nonsugars from sugar-liquor solutions: Directs CHAR-FILTER-OPERATOR HELPER (sugar 
Inspects installations to ensure that hoses are connected to specified manifold pipe.
Posts data on blackboard relating to filter operations, such as starting and ending time and quality of liquor being filtered, filters broken down for char regeneration, and filters being washed to recover sugar in char.
Notifies other stations when changing filter hookups to ensure flow of specified liquor.
Directs helper in removing filter heads, poking filters to break up layers of diatomaceous earth, and changing manifold setups to ensure continuation of refining.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 5 DLU: 77
521.382-010 EVAPORATOR OPERATOR (can.
&
Controls evaporating equipment to concentrate suspensions and solutions to specified degree in vacuum tanks or pans: Pumps liquid into evaporator tank or vacuum pan.
Moves switches to start vacuum pumps and maintain specified pressure.
Turns valves to admit steam into evaporator chest, coils, tubes, or jackets and regulate steam input to maintain specified temperature.
Tests concentration of evaporated solution, using refractometer and hydrometer, and adjusts feeds, temperatures, and pressure accordingly.
Pumps concentrated liquid to storage.
May tend auxiliary equipment, such as settling tanks, preheating tanks, condensers, and cooling equipment.
May supervise workers weighing and mixing batches to predetermined formulas.
May pump batch through sterilizer.
May control chiller to reduce temperature of fresh citrus juice.
May be designated according to material evaporated as Evaporator Operator, Molasses (can.
&
&
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 5 DLU: 78
521.382-014 SEPARATOR OPERATOR (grain-feed mills)
Operates flotation machine to remove germs (embryos) from cracked grain, and tests product to ensure conformance with standards: Determines specific gravity of cracked grain suspension, using hydrometer.
Turns valves to add grain or water to attain specified density.
Starts machine that agitates suspension and permits oil-laden germs to rise to surface.
Adds liquid of specified density that causes germs to float and tests residue for presence of germs.
Makes iodine titration on fluid and suspension leaving germ separator, computes sulfur dioxide content from amount of iodine added, and records test findings.
May turn valves to regulate flow of materials to other processes, as directed.
May operate shakers to remove bran and other fibers from starch suspension.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M2 L2 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
521.385-010 CRACKING-AND-FANNING-MACHINE OPERATOR (sugar 
Tends one or more cracking and fanning machines that shell and crack cocoa beans and separate shells from nibs (cracked beans) preparatory to further processing: Starts machine rollers and blowers that shell and crack beans and starts conveyors that carry off shells and transfer nibs to treating drum.
Turns handwheels to adjust roller pressure so that resultant nibs are of specified size.
Moves handles to adjust air supply to blower to ensure thorough separation of shells from nibs.
Observes thermometer and turns cold water valve to cool conveyor carrying beans from roaster to cracking fanning machine.
May grind nibs to obtain liquid chocolate of specified consistency [LIQUOR-GRINDING-MILL OPERATOR (sugar 
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
521.462-010 REFINERY OPERATOR, ASSISTANT (grain-feed mills)
Controls semiautomatic refinery equipment to convert starch into liquid sugars and concentrate sugars to specific density: Controls pumps and flow of materials through converters, neutralizers, and evaporators, as instructed.
Operates equipment manually during breakdowns [CONVERTER OPERATOR (grain-feed mills); NEUTRALIZER (grain-feed mills)].
Observes instruments to detect equipment malfunctions and reports readings to REFINERY OPERATOR (grain-feed mills).
Observes equipment to detect and correct fluid leakage or spillage.
Tests sample of product to verify specific gravity, acid strength, and filtration, using hydrometer and other standard test equipment.
Adds acids or alkalies to neutralize converted sugar liquors, and verifies concentration, using pH meter.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 6 DLU: 77
521.565-010 LIQUOR-BRIDGE OPERATOR (sugar 
Tends equipment to regulate flow of liquor (sugar solution) from char filters to receiving tanks, as scheduled: Opens valves and starts pumps to maintain flow of liquor into specified storage tank.
Places weir box (flow box) under outlet pipe from filter with flow box outlet over gutter leading to tank inlet.
Changes position of weir, in accordance with notices from CHAR-FILTER OPERATOR (sugar 
Regulates flow of soft liquor bypass to attain specified color and purity of soft-sugar liquor (brown sugar).
Records hourly readings of soft-liquor flow and purities.
Directs LIQUOR-BRIDGE-OPERATOR HELPER (sugar 
Keeps record of filter operations.
Takes samples of liquors for laboratory analysis.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
521.565-014 MASH-FILTER OPERATOR (beverage) alternate titles: filter-press operator; mash-filter-press operator
Tends filter machine to clarify and separate wort from mash: Observes pressure gauges and turns valves to permit and regulate flow of mash to filter.
Starts pump to recirculate wort through filter until sample reveals desired clarity.
Turns valve on signal from KETTLE OPERATOR (beverage) to sparge (sprinkle) mash residue with hot water to obtain maximum amount of wort.
Measures and records specific gravity of wort with hydrometer and tallies number of barrels obtained from mash.
Turns valve to allow flow of cold water to cool mash residue and filter.
May be designated according to type of filter equipment as Lautertub Tender (beverage).
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.565-018 SOFT-SUGAR OPERATOR, HEAD (sugar 
Tends centrifuging and screening equipment that separate brown sugar crystals from syrup and sifts crystals to obtain powdered sugar: Sets spinning, washing, and steam cycles on automatic centrifuges, and resets cycles as necessary to attain specified color and quality of sugar.
Turns valves to regulate temperature and levels in mixers, surge hoppers, and supply bins.
Gives directions to workers packing sugar in bulk bags.
Ensures that containers are weighed, coded, and sealed according to specifications.
Keeps production records, and prepares reports as specified.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M2 L3 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
521.582-010 SILICA-FILTER OPERATOR (beverage) alternate titles: filter-machine operator
Operates silica-filtering machine to remove protein and yeast particles from beer: Positions filter screens between frames and lowers screens into filter tank, using power winch.
Fills mixing tank with specified amounts of silica and water.
Starts agitator that mixes water and silica, and starts pump to transfer mixture into filter tank and coat screens.
Turns calibrated carbon dioxide air valve to pressurize tank.
Starts pump that transfers beer from storage tank through filter screens to strain protein and yeast particles from beer.
Drains off sample of beer and examines it for clarity.
Starts pump to transfer filtered beer to bottle-house storage tank or to lager cellars for carbonation.
Removes screens from tank, using power winch, and rinses screens with water, using hose.
Records number of barrels and type of beer filtered on production records.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M1 L1 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
521.585-010 CENTRIFUGAL-STATION OPERATOR, AUTOMATIC (sugar 
Tends battery of automatic batch-type, recycling centrifugals that separate sugar crystals from mother liquor (syrup): Sets timing of cycles on control board, according to type and consistency of syrup being processed.
Turns switches on control panel to start centrifugals and regulate flow of solution.
Observes colored panel lights, dials, and continuous graphs, and adjusts controls to maintain specified temperature, pressure, and cycling and recycling operations.
Adjusts timers or controls as necessary to obtain specified operating conditions.
Observes progress of solution through loading, washing, spin drying, and dumping processes to detect faulty operation of equipment.
Records operational data.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 5 DLU: 77
521.585-014 MILLER (beverage)
Tends milling machine that grinds malted barley and cereals, such as corn and rice, for use in making brew mash: Starts preset milling machine and conveyor.
Pulls chain to open slide gate on storage bin and drop grain onto conveyor for transfer to machine.
Weighs milled grain, using scale hopper or machine.
Records weight and type of product milled.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.585-018 POWDER-MILL OPERATOR (sugar 
Tends powder-mill pulverizer that grinds granular sugar into fondant or powdered sugar: Starts powder mill, conveyors, dust collectors, and humidifying equipment to ready station for operations.
Opens valves to admit and regulate flow of sugar into pulverizer.
Adjusts controls to compensate for changes and fluctuations in production.
Dissolves specified amounts of sugar in water and spins solution in centrifugal device to determine starch percentage.
Regulates starch flow to bring percentage within specified limits and prevent powder from caking.
Dissolves other samples to test them for grist.
Cleans dust lines, scrolls, and chutes and clears hopper and elevator blockades.
Observes dials and gauges to ascertain that grinders are not overloaded or overheated.
Inspects chains, belts, and scrolls for signs of wear.
Keeps records of tests and production.
May be designated according to type of sugar pulverized as Powdered-Sugar-Pulverizer Operator (sugar 
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M2 L2 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
521.662-010 MILLER, WET PROCESS (grain-feed mills)
Operates fuss and impact mills to crack and grind steeped or degerminated grain, such as corn or milo, to facilitate separation of starch, bran, and gluten: Turns handwheels and moves levers to regulate pinch of buhrs and to control flow of grain through gates.
Opens valve to start flow of liquid starch into mill to flush buhrs.
Feels ground grain to ascertain if specified degree of fineness is attained.
Signals millhouse workers to ensure continuous flow of materials to and from grinding mill.
May disassemble mill to install new buhrs, using wrenches and hoist.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M2 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
521.665-010 CHAR-FILTER-TANK TENDER, HEAD (grain-feed mills)
Tends char filter tanks that remove undesirable colloids from glucose and corn syrup: Signals FILTER-TANK-TENDER HELPER, HEAD (grain-feed mills) to fill tanks with char (activated carbon) and turn valves to start flow of syrup from storage.
Couples flexible pipe to filters to transfer solution to and from filters, or signals FILTER-TANK-TENDER HELPER, HEAD (grain-feed mills) to couple pipe.
Collects sample of solution to examine color and measure density, using hydrometer.
Reads thermometers and directs workers to turn steam valves to maintain specified temperature.
Directs workers engaged in washing activated carbon and informs CHAR PULLER (grain-feed mills; sugar 
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
521.665-014 EXTRACTOR-MACHINE OPERATOR (can.
&
Tends machines that extract juice from citrus fruit: Starts machines, observes fruit rolling down chutes, and clears jams by prodding fruit with stick.
Inspects machine for proper functioning.
Examines refuse to determine whether maximum amount of juice had been extracted.
Notifies supervisor of needed adjustments or faulty machine operation.
Stops machines when signal indicates juice tanks are filled.
Lubricates and cleans machines.
May make minor adjustments to machines.
May change reamer heads for different fruit sizes.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.665-018 FILTER-PRESS TENDER, HEAD (grain-feed mills)
Tends filter presses that remove solids, such as carbon, proteins, and $T3filtracell,$T1 from solution to produce glucose syrup of standard color and clarity: Turns valves to control flow of material through press.
Folds and jams edges of filter cloths between plates to seal leaks in press, using sharp-edged tool.
Observes gauges for increased pressure which indicate need for cleaning presses, and notifies PRESS PULLERS (grain-feed mills) when cleaning is required.
Starts agitator and pumps that transfer filtrate into tank.
Washes filter cloths in washing machine.
May add activated carbon to tank to decolorize filtrate.
May tend vacuum or cloth filter press that removes water from corn tailings used in preparing stock feed and be known as Press Tender, Head, Feed House (grain-feed mills).
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
521.665-022 RICE CLEANING MACHINE TENDER (grain-feed mills)
Tends battery of machines that clean rough grain preparatory to milling, and mill, brush, grade, and polish grain: Starts machines, such as shelling stones, grain hullers, paddy separators, grain brush, grain cleaning machine, and grain polisher.
Turns wheels to adjust feeder equipment of machines.
Turns valves to regulate flow of compressed air into machines to blow chaff and dust from grain.
Examines grain during processing to ensure that production and quality standards are met.
Adjusts machines.
Opens gates on feed pipes to route grain to designated milling machines.
Performs maintenance duties, such as scraping sieves in machine with stick to remove dirt, straw, or other foreign material, lubricating equipment, and tightening belts, bolts, and nuts, using mechanics handtools.
Gauges height of grain in storage tank, using tape measure.
Converts measurement to number of bushels in bin, using conversion chart.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
521.665-026 SIEVE-GRADER TENDER (can.
&
Tends battery of rotary or oscillating screens that segregate vegetables, such as peas and beets, according to size: Starts motors to activate screens and observes peas passing over screens to prevent clogging and overflow.
Observes signal and opens hopper gate to permit peas of specified size and grade to drop into whitening trough for decolorization.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.682-010 CENTRIFUGAL OPERATOR (grain-feed mills; sugar 
Operates centrifugal machines to separate and wash molasses and mother liquor (syrup) from sugar crystals: Opens gate allowing sugar mass to flow into centrifuge basket.
Starts centrifuge that automatically passes through cycles of spinning off mother liquor, washing off molasses, and spinning off washwater.
Lifts plate covering bottom of basket, positions cutting arm over sugar and starts machine to cut sugar crystals from inside basket.
Washes centrifuge, using hose.
May be designated by type of sugar processed as Soft-Sugar Cutter (sugar 
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
521.682-014 COCOA-PRESS OPERATOR (sugar 
Operates one or more hydraulic cocoa presses that remove specified amounts of cocoa butter (natural oil of cocoa bean) from chocolate liquor: Starts pump to remove liquor from storage to steam-heated tanks.
Observes thermometers and sets thermostat to heat liquor to specified temperature.
Sets pressure gauge and stroke of ram on cocoa press, according to specifications, using handtools.
Starts press to activate ram that automatically fills pots with chocolate liquor, extrudes specified amounts of cocoa butter into holding tank, and ejects cocoa cakes onto conveyor.
Records weight of cocoa butter as indicated on scale-equipped holding tank.
May start pump to move cocoa butter into storage tank through filters or centrifugal separator to remove cocoa residue [COCOA-BUTTER-FILTER OPERATOR (sugar 
May fill pots, remove and stack cocoa cakes, and install steel and fiber separator pads by hand when machine is nonautomatic.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
521.682-018 FILTER OPERATOR (grain-feed mills)
Operates filter machine to separate contaminants from cornstarch and controls temperature and specific gravity of starch suspension fed to filters: Turns valves to admit water to dilute starch suspension in standardization tank, until hydrometer indicates specific gravity of solution conforms to specifications.
Starts pumps and turns valves to transfer starch suspension between filter and tanks, and to regulate flow of wash water to filter spray nozzles.
Reads thermometers and turns steam valves to heat tank coils and maintain specified temperature of water.
Assists in changing filter cloths, and repairs or replaces broken filter strings.
May flush soiled filter cloths, using hose.
May insert wires into filter nozzles to clear clogging.
May standardize starch suspensions in batch tanks after filtering [BATCH-TANK CONTROLLER (grain-feed mills)].
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 5 DLU: 77
521.682-022 FLAKE MILLER, WHEAT AND OATS (grain-feed mills) alternate titles: cereal miller
Operates drier, huller, separator, steel cutter, cooker, and flake roller machines to produce wheat and oats flakes, according to specifications: Adjusts slides in chutes and turns valves to regulate flow of grain to machines.
Adjusts flow of air to dry grain and feels grain to determine hulling capability.
Observes hulling process and adjusts speed of machines that remove and separate hulls from oats.
Turns valves to regulate temperature and moisture in cooker, and adjusts tension on flaking-machine rolls, according to hardness and size of grain.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M2 L3 SVP: 5 DLU: 77
521.682-026 GRINDER OPERATOR (grain-feed mills) alternate titles: feed miller; gristmiller; mill operator; roller-mill operator
Operates bank of roll grinders to grind grain into meal or flour: Opens and closes slides in spouts to route grain to various grinders and sifters.
Turns wheels to adjust pressure of grinding rollers for each break (passage of grain between rollers), according to grain size and hardness, and adjusts feed chutes to regulate flow of grain to rollers.
Inspects product and sifts out chaff to determine percentage of yield.
Adjusts rollers to maintain maximum yield.
Replaces worn grinding rollers, using handtools.
May sift and bolt meal or flour.
May clean and temper grain prior to grinding.
May direct workers who drain and temper grain and bolt meal or flour.
May be designated according to grain milled as Corn Miller (grain-feed mills).
May operate burr mills instead of roll grinders to grind grain and be designated Burr-Mill Operator (grain-feed mills).
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M1 L2 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
521.682-030 HULLER OPERATOR (grain-feed mills)
Operates machines to clean rice and remove hulls from rice preparatory to milling: Starts machinery, such as rice cleaner, reel, shelling stones, rice huller, and conveyor.
Adjusts gate in spout to regulate flow of rice into reel.
Observes cleaning and hulling processes, feels rice, and adjusts machinery to ensure rice is processed in accordance with specifications.
Performs related duties, such as lubricating equipment and repairing machinery.
May keep production reports.
May direct workers in storage of graded rice.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M1 L1 SVP: 5 DLU: 77
521.682-034 REFINING-MACHINE OPERATOR (sugar 
Operates refining machines equipped with rollers to grind chocolate paste in accordance with specifications: Starts conveyor to feed chocolate into refiner hoppers.
Feels consistency of chocolate in hoppers to determine grinding required.
Turns handwheels on machine to adjust clearance between rollers.
Opens hopper and starts machine that feeds chocolate between rollers of refining machine.
Observes thermometer or feels rollers and turns water valves to obtain specified temperature of rollers.
Examines, feels, and tastes ground chocolate paste to ascertain if color, texture, and taste meet standards.
Collects sample of paste for laboratory analysis.
May observe flowmeters and turn valves to measure out cocoa butter, vegetable oil, and other ingredients, according to formula, and to fortify chocolate in mixing tanks.
May scoop refined chocolate paste into wheeled troughs or barrels.
May weigh and transport barrels to cold storage rooms, using handtruck.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R3 M2 L2 SVP: 6 DLU: 77
521.682-038 SHRIMP-PEELING-MACHINE OPERATOR (can.
&
Sets up and operates peeling machine to behead and peel shrimp preparatory to canning or freezing: Spaces peeling rolls on machine, according to size of shrimp to be processed and adjusts holding rack bars to intermesh between rolls, using wrenches.
Turns thumbscrews to adjust spring tension on holding rack bars, according to shrimp size and turns valves to start water flow over rolls.
Starts machine and feed conveyor and spreads shrimp over feed pan at head of rolls to ensure even distribution, using wooden rake.
Examines samples of peeled shrimp to ensure conformance with standards.
Adjusts roll spacing and holding for tension as required.
Dismantles and cleans machine with high-pressure stream from water hose.
May sterilize machine parts by directing hot water or live steam over them with hose.
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M1 L2 SVP: 5 DLU: 77
521.685-010 ALMOND HULLER (can.
&
Tends machine that removes hulls and foreign matter from almonds: Starts machine and dumps almonds into hopper of machine.
Moves levers to control flow of almonds from hopper to machine that agitates screens or cylinders to remove hulls from almonds.
Turns valve to regulate pressure and directional flow of air that separates loose hulls, twigs and foreign matter from nuts.
Observes almonds as they pass on conveyor belt from machine to ascertain that hulls are removed.
Changes screens or adjusts cylinders of machine to accommodate different varieties of almonds, using wrench.
May sew sacks of almonds.
May nail covers on crates filled with hulled almonds.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-014 ALMOND-BLANCHER OPERATOR (can.
&
Tends almond-blanching machine that removes skins from almonds: Turns valves to fill kettle of machine with water and to admit steam into heating chamber of kettle.
Observes steam pressure and water temperature gauges, and turns valves to regulate steam pressure and water temperature, according to specifications.
Actuates machine to start flow of almonds into kettle.
Turns handwheel to adjust rollers that squeeze skins from almonds.
Observes blanched (skinned) almonds as they emerge from blanching machine and makes necessary adjustments to machine to ensure that skins are removed.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-018 ALMOND-CUTTING-MACHINE TENDER (can.
&
Tends machine that dices, halves, slices, or slivers almond meats: Installs specified cutting blades, using handtools.
Actuates machine to start flow of almond meats into machine.
Examines cut almond meats to check for conformance with cutting specifications.
Adjusts cutting blades as required.
Inserts different blades into machine to accommodate various sizes of almonds.
Sharpens blades with file or $T3bench grinder.$T1 May be designated according to function of machine tended as Dicer-Machine Operator (can.
&
&
&
&
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
521.685-022 BATCH-TANK CONTROLLER (grain-feed mills)
Tends equipment to maintain specific gravity of starch suspensions emerging from filter machines and starch-flushing system, and transfers solution for conversion into sugar and glucose: Dips sample from breaker tank and tests for specific gravity, using hydrometer.
Turns valves to return suspension for reflushing if density does not meet standards.
Starts tank agitators to prevent starch from settling.
Turns valves and starts pumps to transfer solution to storage tanks.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
521.685-026 BLEACHER, LARD (meat products; oils 
Tends equipment that bleaches and filters unrefined lard or edible oil: Starts pumps to draw unrefined material from storage tank into bleaching kettle.
Dumps prescribed amount of fuller's earth into kettle to absorb impurities in material.
Starts agitators to mix materials.
Turns valves to allow steam or cool water to circulate through bleacher coils to heat or cool material to specified temperature.
Draws sample of material for laboratory analysis.
Dumps additional fuller's earth in kettle as directed.
Inserts new filter cloths on filter plates.
Starts pumps to draw material from bleaching kettle and force it through filter-press.
Starts pumps to drain bleached and filtered material from filter-press tank into storage tank.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-030 BOLTER (grain-feed mills) alternate titles: sifter operator
Tends banks of sifting and purifying machines that separate fine flour from coarse flour or middlings: Opens spouts and adjusts feed slides to route flour to machines and to regulate flow across sifters without overloading.
Feels sifted flour to detect uneven texture that indicates breaks in screens.
Pulls screen frames from machine to locate and replace broken screens.
Records weights of flour grades produced as indicated on automatic scales.
May collect flour samples periodically for laboratory testing.
May perform color tests of flour, comparing color of various batches to maintain quality of milled product.
May be designated according to machine tended as Purifier (grain-feed mills).
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
521.685-034 BREAKING-MACHINE OPERATOR (sugar 
Tends machine that breaks scored sheets of chewing gum into tablet size pieces.
Starts machine and empties trays of scored gum sheets into revolving drum of machine.
Inserts wire mesh basket into opening of machine to collect and withdraw gum tablets.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-038 BRINE-TANK-SEPARATOR OPERATOR (can.
&
Tends gravity-fed brine-filled tanks that separate young, tender vegetables, such as peas and lima beans, from more matured vegetables: Turns valve to add solution to tank and maintain specified level.
Pushes vegetables down chute to prevent clogging, as vegetables emerge from tank.
Cleans tank and work area, using scraper and water hose.
May mix brine solution [BRINE-MIXER OPERATOR, AUTOMATIC (can.
&
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-042 CENTRIFUGE OPERATOR (dairy products)
Tends centrifuge machines that refine liquid wort for use in making malted milk: Assembles and attaches bowl, rings, and cover onto centrifuge, using hoist and handtools.
Starts machine, observes tachometer, and adjusts controls to regulate speed.
Starts pumps, turns valves, and observes gauges to convey wort through machine at specified pressure.
Regulates clarity of wort by observing color and turning valves to alter pressure flow.
Removes solids from machine with wooden paddle.
Cleans machine with water.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M2 L2 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-046 CENTRIFUGE OPERATOR (grain-feed mills)
Tends centrifugal separator and flotation cells that separate starch from gluten in processing milled grain: Observes recording instruments, turns valves, and moves levers to obtain specified temperatures, specific gravities, and air, water, and product flow rates in centrifuges and flotation cells.
Inspects, cleans, and lubricates equipment.
Observes gauges and turns valves to maintain level of wash and dilution waters in supply tanks.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M2 L2 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
521.685-050 CENTRIFUGE OPERATOR (oils 
Tends centrifuge machines to remove solid impurities and water from animal and vegetable oils: Turns valves to admit steam to jackets of machines.
Starts pumps and opens valves to feed oil to machines and to transfer oil to receiving tanks.
Observes gauges on machines to determine when temperature is within prescribed range.
May rub oil between fingers to detect grit and reprocess oil that does not meet company standards.
May open valves to pump oil through one or more settling tanks to separate water from oil.
May clean centrifuge and settling tanks.
Does not utilize heat when processing essential oils, such as citrus oils, due to volatility of these oils.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M2 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
521.685-054 CLARIFIER (grain-feed mills; oils 
Tends equipment that removes sediment and moisture to purify oleo stock: Turns steam valve to heat clarifying tank.
Positions strainers across filling vents of tank.
Turns valve to start flow of oleo stock through strainers and into tank.
Removes foreign material from surface of hot oleo stack, using skimmer.
Observes gauges and adjusts steam valves to keep oleo stock heated to specified temperature.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-058 CLARIFIER (beverage)
Tends machine that clarifies wine prior to filtering: Starts pump to transfer fermented wine from settling cask to clarifying tank.
Spreads chemicals over surface of wine to aid in clarification, and starts agitator to mix ingredients for specified period of time.
Stops agitator to allow suspended matter to settle.
Starts pumps to transfer clarified wine to filtering tank.
May fumigate empty wine casks with bottled gas and burn sulfur sticks in casks to kill bacteria.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L2 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
521.685-062 CLEAN-RICE GRADER AND REEL TENDER (grain-feed mills)
Tends machines that clean, grade, and polish rice: Turns wheels of feeder box to regulate amount of rice on cleaning screen.
Adjusts air valve to regulate air draft that removes dust and straw from rice on screen.
Regulates air suction in aspirator that cools rice and removes bran.
Observes rice passing through reels that separate brewer's rice (broken grains) from rice screenings (larger broken grains) and head rice (whole grains).
Adjusts rice grader to ensure required separation of rice screenings from head rice.
Tends machine that mixes water and corn syrup used as rice polish.
Opens outlet in mixer to permit polish to flow into auger mixer and polish rice.
GOE: 06.03.02 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
521.685-066 COCOA-BEAN CLEANER (sugar 
Tends machine that removes from cocoa beans, such foreign materials as stones, string and dirt: Selects bags of cocoa beans, according to instructions and transfers them to hopper of machine, using handtruck; or presses button to start conveyors that move beans from silo to hopper.
Opens bags with knife and dumps beans into machine hopper.
Positions conveyor spout to direct cleaned beans to specified silo for storage.
Starts conveyors and machine that carry beans through air-cleaning system to remove foreign matter.
Observes cleaning process to detect machine malfunction or material overflow.
Removes and stacks sacks of dirt from discharge spout of air-cleaning system.
Examines silo to verify conveyance of specified type of bean.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-070 COCOA-BUTTER-FILTER OPERATOR (sugar 
Tends press that separates residue from cocoa butter: Reads pressure gauge and starts pump that forces unrefined cocoa butter through filter screen to separate residue from oil and transfers refined cocoa butter to storage.
Unclamps door of filter to remove screen and gain access to interior of machine.
Flushes and removes residue from screen and filter interior, using scraper and water hose.
May treat cocoa butter with prescribed amounts of charcoal and clay to deodorize cocoa butter in treatment tank and filter press.
May tend centrifuge to separate cocoa butter from residue and be designated Centrifugal Separator (sugar 
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-074 COCOA-ROOM OPERATOR (sugar 
Tends automatic equipment and machinery that pulverizes cocoa cakes into powder of specified fineness and weighs and bags cocoa powders: Starts conveyors to move cocoa cakes through rollers of crusher into hammer mill for grinding into powder, through cooling chamber, and into air classification system which separates powder, according to density.
Feels cocoa to ascertain fineness and collects sample for laboratory analysis.
Fastens bag to holding tank outlet and pushes button to discharge specified amount of cocoa into bag through automatic weighing device.
Verifies weight of filled bags, using scale.
Closes bag and stacks bag on skids.
May move cocoa cakes from storage area preparatory to dumping into hopper of crusher, using pallets and handtruck.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
521.685-078 COFFEE GRINDER (food prep., nec) alternate titles: granulizing-machine operator
Tends machines that grind coffee beans to specified fineness: Pulls lever or adjusts control to regulate flow of coffee beans into grinding machines.
Starts machines and turns dials or moves levers to adjust grinding rollers.
May control conveyors that carry ground coffee to storage bins.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-082 CORN GRINDER (food prep., nec)
Tends grinding machine that hulls cooked corn and grinds it into masa (cornmeal dough) for use in production of products, such as tortillas and corn chips: Scoops cooked corn into hopper of grinding machine or attaches pipe to outlet on soaking vat and starts pump to transfer corn from holding vat through washer and onto conveyor that carries corn into hopper of grinder.
Starts grinder.
Feels masa to determine consistency of grind, and adjusts grinding stones when necessary.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
521.685-086 CORN-GRINDER OPERATOR, AUTOMATIC (grain-feed mills)
Tends semiautomatic machine that crushes and rolls cooked corn into dough for use in various prepared food products: Starts machine and moves controls to set speed of grinder screws and clearance of spreader rollers to produce dough of specified texture and thickness.
Fingers handful of dough to verify texture and fineness of grind.
Moves controls to synchronize conveyor speed with machine action, maintaining dough supply at efficient level for production of food products by other workers.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-090 CRUSHER OPERATOR (sugar 
Tends series of multiple roller mills that grind sugarcane to extract sugar juice.
Moves levers to feed shredded sugarcane into mills.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
521.685-094 CRUSHING-MACHINE OPERATOR (beverage) alternate titles: grape crusher
Tends machine that crushes grapes to form must (juice, pulp, and skins of grape) for use in making wine: Starts machine and regulates rate of flow of grapes into crusher.
Opens outlet valves to drain must into fermenting tanks.
Starts refuse conveyor that removes stems from machine.
Removes debris from crusher reservoir (sump) and outlets.
Cleans and lubricates machine.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-098 CUTTER, FROZEN MEAT (can.
&
Tends machine that cuts frozen meats, such as fish, poultry, and beef into pieces preparatory to grinding: Dumps cartons of food product onto cutting table.
Starts machine and positions meat in front of pusher.
Starts automatic pusher or turns handwheel to push meat into cutter, and to regulate thickness of cut.
May record weight of meat cut.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-102 CUTTING-MACHINE OPERATOR (sugar 
Tends machine that cuts candy, such as caramel, nougat, or fudge, in pieces or strips of specified size: Cuts slab of candy into sections, using knife.
Selects cutting disks, mounted on shaft, according to specified width of cut, and installs cutting disks in machine.
Places candy on conveyor that carries it under rotating disks for cutting into strips.
Repositions cut strips on conveyor or feeds strips against knife so that slicing occurs at right angle to first cut, forming square or oblong pieces of candy suitable for shipment or further processing.
Weighs random samples to ensure conformity of product with size and weight specifications.
Dusts candy with flour or starch to prevent sticking.
May tend machine equipped with two cutting heads, and device that changes feed angle so that candy is automatically sliced into strips and cut into pieces of specified size and shape.
May be designated according to candy processed as Caramel Cutter, Machine (sugar 
GOE: 06.02.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M1 L2 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
521.685-106 DETHISTLER OPERATOR (can.
&
Tends flotation cleaner that removes materials, such as pod fragments, leaves, or thistles from peas and other vegetables preparatory to canning or freezing: Mixes emulsion solution with water, according to standard formula.
Turns valves to fill supply and separator tanks, and pretreater with water, and starts heater, pretreater pump, and recovery reel.
Starts separator pump and pours emulsion and oil into air inlet pipe.
Pulls lever to allow vegetables to flow into separator tank which floats foreign material out over recovery reel screen.
May weigh sample of cleaned peas and compute weight loss.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M1 L2 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
521.685-110 DRIED FRUIT WASHER (food prep., nec)
Tends machine that washes dried fruit, such as apricots, figs, prunes, and raisins preparatory to canning, packaging, or making specialty foods, such as mincemeat and chutney: Dumps fruit into hopper of machine.
Starts machine that rotates fruit rapidly in water to remove dirt and automatically ejects fruit onto receiving tray.
May inspect washed fruit and remove foreign matter.
May be designated according to dried fruit washed as Apricot Washer (food prep., nec); Fig Washer (food prep., nec); Prune Washer (food prep., nec); Raisin Washer (food prep., nec).
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-114 EGG-BREAKING-MACHINE OPERATOR (can.
&
Tends machine that breaks eggs and separates yolk from white of egg: Starts machine that automatically breaks eggs and dumps contents into individual cups.
Observes eggs for specified yolk and white color, quality, and clarity.
Trips cup lever to drop inferior yolk or white before cups enter separator trays.
Stops machine to remove contaminated cups.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-118 EXTRACTOR OPERATOR (beverage)
Tends centrifuge or power-driven press that extracts moisture from residue of fermented mash after distillation: Pumps residue from storage tanks into centrifuge, or through filter screens and into power-driven press, that separates solids from liquids and extracts moisture from residue solids.
Starts conveyor or blower system that transfers residue solids to rotary drier for further processing.
Cleans and sterilizes equipment, using steam cleaning apparatus and alkali solutions.
May maintain and repair equipment, using handtools.
May be designated according to equipment tended as Centrifuge Operator (beverage); Press Operator (beverage).
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L2 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
521.685-122 FEED GRINDER (grain-feed mills)
Tends machines that grind, cut, crimp, shell, or roll grain, hay, corncobs, chaff, and screenings for stock and poultry feed: Opens chute to regulate flow of grain into machine or pitches hay and corncobs into machine hopper.
Starts machine and adjusts control to regulate speed, according to fineness of grind specified.
May tend separator that cleans grain prior to grinding or to sift ground grain.
May start conveyors and elevators to transfer processed feed to storage or packing machine bins.
May fill sacks and weigh them on platform scale.
May be designated according to machine tended as Corn-Cutter Operator (grain-feed mills); Corn-Sheller Operator (grain-feed mills); Crimper Operator (grain-feed mills); Crusher-Machine Operator (grain-feed mills); Hammer-Mill Operator (grain-feed mills); Rolled-Oats-Mill Operator (grain-feed mills).
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-126 FILTER OPERATOR (beverage; sugar 
Tends filtering machines that separate liquids from slurry and remove impurities: Starts filter, and turns valves to circulate slurry through filtering machines to recover liquids from slurry.
Moves controls to regulate speed of drum rotation and turns valves to regulate vacuum pressure that forces slurry through liquid.
Observes discharge of filter cake from drum and adjusts controls to regulate speed of drum rotation.
May remove and replace filter cloths and clean drums or plates.
May tend equipment that filters, dionizes, and cools bulk wine.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
521.685-130 FILTER-PRESS TENDER (beverage)
Tends screw-type filter press that removes tartrates from wine or produces sheen on wine prior to bottling: Covers filter plates with cloth pads and turns handwheel to close press.
Starts press and turns valves to admit wine through filters.
Starts pumps to transfer filtered wine to storage tanks or bottling room.
Replaces filter pads.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-134 FILTER-TANK-TENDER HELPER, HEAD (grain-feed mills)
Tends filter tank that separates undesirable solids from glucose and dextrose under direction of CHAR-FILTER-TANK TENDER, HEAD (grain-feed mills): Couples pipe to filters and turns valves to control flow of solution from storage.
Removes filter head, using wrench.
Inserts charging spout into opening of filter and pulls lever of sliding gate to admit char (activated carbon) into filter.
Replaces filter head, using wrench.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-138 FILTERING-MACHINE TENDER (grain-feed mills)
Tends filtering machines that separate cornstarch from undesirable protein solids: Starts machine and turns valves to admit starch suspension from tank through filters and to control flow of wash water to filter spray nozzles.
Observes thermometers and turns steam valves to maintain specified temperature of water in tank.
Controls flow of water into standardization tanks to regulate specific gravity of starch suspension, according to instructions from FILTER OPERATOR (grain-feed mills).
Changes damaged filter cloths and flushes soiled cloths, using hose.
Inserts wire into holes of spray nozzles to prevent clogging.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M2 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
521.685-142 FINISHER OPERATOR (can.
&
Tends filtering equipment that separates skins and seeds from tomato sauce, chile sauce, and catsup, prior to packaging: Installs specified screens in filtering equipment, using handtools.
Places refuse drums under tank outlet to receive skins and seeds.
Starts agitating paddles that force sauce through filter screens to separate skins and seeds from liquid.
Dips ladle into sauce tank to obtain sample for examination.
Examines sauce for consistency and presence of skins and seeds that indicate clogged or damaged filter screens.
Changes damaged screens, using handtools.
Starts pump to transfer filtered sauce to holding tanks.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-146 FRUIT-PRESS OPERATOR (beverage; can.
&
Tends power press that extracts juice from fruit: Positions empty filter bags between sections of press, or places frame equipped with filter cloth (blanket) on press cart.
Pulls lever or turns valve to release fruit from hopper or pipeline into bag openings or onto filter cloth.
Seals tops of filled bags, using metal clamps; or spreads fruit evenly over filter cloth, folds corners of cloth to cover fruit, removes forming frame, and pushes cart loaded with fruit into press.
Starts press.
Removes filter bags or pulls cart from press and dumps fruit pulp residue into container.
May start pump to transfer juice to storage tanks.
May perform duties as member of crew.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-150 GLUTEN-SETTLING TENDER (grain-feed mills)
Tends settling tanks that separate gluten from water: Turns valves to discharge gluten and water from starch tables into tank.
Turns and adjusts inlet and outlet valves to maintain constant level in tank until water has drained from settled grain.
Starts pump that transfers gluten to $T3plate press.$T1 Pushes remaining gluten from tank, using squeegee, and cleans tank, using hose.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-154 GRADER TENDER (agriculture)
Tends machines that clean and grade seed corn: Starts machines and opens chute gate to permit corn to flow through series of vibrating screens.
Adjusts chute slides to regulate flow of corn to reciprocating screens and revolving cylinders that separate corn kernels, according to width, thickness, and length.
Examines graded kernels for uniformity, using test screen.
Replaces defective screens and cylinders.
GOE: 03.04.01 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
521.685-158 GRANULATING-MACHINE OPERATOR (tobacco) alternate titles: granulator operator
Tends machine that cuts tobacco into granular form and screens dust and coarse particles from granulated tobacco: Starts conveyor, cutting knives, fans, and screens.
Shovels tobacco into hopper and shoves tobacco between feed rolls of machine that carry tobacco under cutting knives.
Observes screening process and removes foreign material left in screened tobacco.
Places boxes or trucks at discharge end of machine to catch granulated tobacco.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-162 GRATED-CHEESE MAKER (dairy products) alternate titles: grating-machine operator
Tends grinding, drying, and cooling equipment to make grated cheese: Starts grater, drying drums or drying chamber, heater, blowers, cooling cones, and hammer mill.
Dumps cheese blocks into feedbox of grater, and starts ram that pushes cheese against grating wheel.
Tests sample of grated cheese for moisture content, using moisture meter, and turns handles or valves to alter conveyor speed or flow of hot air in drier to obtain specified moisture content.
Observes gauges on cooling chambers and milling hammers, and notifies supervisor of deviation from specifications.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M2 L2 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
521.685-166 GRINDER OPERATOR (grain-feed mills)
Tends grinding mills that process baked or dried bulk cereal products prior to packaging: Starts grinder and opens chute gate on hopper to direct bulk cereal between grinding rolls.
Sifts handful of ground and graded cereal through set of screens to determine whether cereal has been ground to specified size.
Moves levers to adjust roll clearance in grinder to produce cereal comparable to that of screened sample.
Cleans and replaces clogged or worn screens.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-170 HASHER OPERATOR (meat products) alternate titles: mincing-machine operator
Tends machine that chops (hashes) and rinses entrails, fat, and other condemned or inedible parts of carcasses preparatory to rendering: Starts hasher machine and feeds meat onto machine conveyor or into hopper by hand or using pitchfork or shovel.
Turns valves to admit water into revolving drum of washer that rinses chopped meat.
Dismantles and cleans machine, using wrench and water hose.
May cut up whole carcasses, using cleaver.
May chill pieces of fat with ice before hashing.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-174 HONEY EXTRACTOR (food prep., nec)
Tends machine that extracts liquid honey from combs: Places decapped honeycombs in baskets of honey-extracting machine and closes cover.
Sets clock for specified time cycle and starts extractor machine to pump honey from honeycombs to drums for storage.
Stops machine when time bell rings.
Removes emptied honeycombs from machine and places them in vacant supers.
May cut caps from honeycombs [HONEYCOMB DECAPPER (food prep., nec)].
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-178 HOP STRAINER (beverage) alternate titles: hop separator
Tends machine and equipment to strain hops (used in flavoring beer) from hot wort: Turns valves and starts pumps to transfer wort from brew kettle, through straining machine, and into hot wort storage tank.
Starts conveyor which disposes of hops removed from wort.
Turns intake and outlet valves to control rate of straining.
Observes flowmeters and pressure gauges to determine if equipment is malfunctioning.
Inspects strained wort through portholes and sight glasses to ascertain if hops have been removed.
Cleans interior and exterior of straining machine with water hose.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-182 HOPPER ATTENDANT (sugar 
Tends equipment that distributes and screens sugar: Opens hopper gates, and starts, reverses, or stops feed scrolls to distribute sugar to bulk systems and packing station.
Adjusts feed of sugar to rotating screens that separate sugar crystals, according to size.
Collects samples of grists for laboratory analysis.
GOE: 06.04.40 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-186 HOT-WORT SETTLER (beverage)
Tends equipment to fill tanks with hot wort and permit solids to settle before transferring to cooling machine: Opens valves to admit hot wort from hop strainer to storage tank.
Taps (drains) filled tanks after solids have settled.
Turns valves, sets float line, and pulls bottom plug to drain wort into cooling line.
Climbs into empty settling tank to scrub inside and remove residue, using hose and brush.
May read gauges and record amount of hot wort received in tanks.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-190 ION EXCHANGE OPERATOR (beverage)
Tends equipment that removes chemical salts from wine: Starts pump and opens valves to circulate wine through column of synthetic resin crystals to absorb potassium ions from wine.
Opens valve to admit water into column to backflush accumulated sediment.
Opens valve and starts pump to circulate acid or brine solution through column to regenerate resin crystals.
Notifies maintenance engineer of equipment malfunction.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-194 LABORATORY MILLER (grain-feed mills)
Tends machines that clean and grind samples of grain to obtain flour samples for testing: Pours grain into machines to remove chaff, dirt, undesirable seeds, and determine moisture content.
Dumps cleaned grain into mill hopper to grind wheat into flour.
Dumps flour into machine to sift it into standard flour samples.
Dumps samples in container and records identifying data for laboratory information.
May perform chemical tests on grain and flour samples.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
521.685-198 LINTER TENDER (oils 
Tends battery of linter machines that remove linters (bits of cotton fibers adhering to cottonseed) before seed is crushed and pressed to extract oil: Starts flow of seed into machine.
Observes and feels seeds that flow from machine to ensure removal of linters.
Turns thumbscrews to regulate pressure of seed against saws.
Removes setscrews with wrench and moves shaft holding brushes closer to saws to maintain efficient cleaning operation.
May assist LINTER-SAW SHARPENER (oils 
GOE: 06.04.19 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
521.685-202 LIQUOR-GRINDING-MILL OPERATOR (sugar 
Tends one or more grinding mills that grind nibs (cracked cocoa beans) or preground nibs of cocoa bean paste to obtain liquid chocolate of specified consistency: Starts machine and opens slide gate of hopper to release nibs, or turns valve to permit paste to flow through grinding stones.
Observes ammeter on machine to determine amount of current produced by friction of grinding stone, and moves handles to adjust clearance between stones.
Feels and tastes liquor to ascertain if texture conforms to standards.
Draws sample for laboratory analysis.
Pumps liquor to storage tanks.
May pregrind nibs into paste-like consistency.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
521.685-206 LYE-PEEL OPERATOR (can.
&
Tends machine that removes skins of fruits and vegetables and outer membrane of peeled citrus fruits: Turns valves to admit steam to heat lye solution in tank and to regulate lye and water sprays.
Starts conveyor to carry fruit or vegetables through machine.
Observes and feels fruit or vegetable emerging from machine to determine if immersion time is sufficient to ensure removal of skin or membrane.
May load conveyor by hand.
May prepare lye solution by dumping lye chips into tank of heated water.
May scald products to loosen skin or peel and be designated Scalder (can.
&
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-210 MEAL-GRINDER TENDER (grain-feed mills) alternate titles: roller tender
Tends machines that grind grain between rollers: Observes flow of grain between grinding rollers.
Adjusts slides to regulate flow of grain to rollers and turns hand screws to regulate space between rollers, under direction of GRINDER OPERATOR (grain-feed mills).
Pulls lever to spring rolls apart when grain stops flowing, to prevent damage to rollers.
May start conveyor that transports grain from storage area to grinding machines.
May lubricate machines.
May obtain sample of ground grain for testing.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-214 MEAT GRINDER (meat products)
Tends machine that grinds meat for use in making such products as bologna, meat loaves, and sausages: Pushes truck of cut meat from cooler room to grinding machine.
Selects and inserts grinding plate in machine for specified particle size.
Shovels meat into machine hopper, using fork, and positions truck under discharge spout.
Starts machine.
May cut chunks of meat into smaller pieces, using power operated cleaver or slicer.
May select and weigh meat in cooler room for grinding.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-218 MEAT-GRADING-MACHINE OPERATOR (can.
&
Tends grading machine that sorts almond meats, according to size: Loosens turnbuckles to open grading machine, using wrench, and inserts circular grading screens into drum of machine.
Closes drum of machine, and turns knob to regulate air pressure, according to specifications.
Starts flow of almond meats into machine, and starts machine that sorts almond meats by shaking action that causes smaller almond meats to drop through holes on screens and larger almond meats to run off top of screen onto conveyor belts.
Observes almond meats on screen to ensure that they are sorted as required.
Tightens or loosens bolt on spindle of machine to adjust shaking action of grading screen to sort almond meats as specified.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-222 MILK-POWDER GRINDER (dairy products) alternate titles: malted-milk mixer
Tends equipment that mills and sifts milk powders: Fastens specified screen in sifter, using handtools, and starts hammer mill, vibrating sifter, and tank agitator.
Starts conveyor that transfers coarse, dried powder from sifter to hammer mill.
Turns crank to move motor belt and alter speed of hammer mill to obtain specified consistency.
Starts pneumatic vacuum blower to convey ground powder through sifter to storage tank.
Fills bags or barrels with powder [PACKAGER, MACHINE (any industry)].
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-226 MILL OPERATOR (grain-feed mills)
Tends mills that grind stockfeed: Turns gate valves on feed chute to regulate flow of materials into mills.
Starts mills and turns handwheel to adjust distance between rollers to attain desired fineness of grind.
Feels sample of product to verify fineness of grind.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-230 MONITOR-AND-STORAGE-BIN TENDER (grain-feed mills) alternate titles: storage-bin adjuster
Tends machine that blows chaff and foreign material from rice and regulates flow of rice to designated storage bins: Starts machine and turns control valve to regulate flow of rice from storage bin to feeder box.
Opens valve to release compressed air into machine to blow chaff and foreign material from rice as it passes over sieves.
Pulls out slide on top of storage bin to allow rice to flow into bin.
Scrapes sieves in machine with stick to remove dirt, straw, and other foreign material.
Lubricates equipment and tightens belts, nuts, and bolts.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-234 NUT GRINDER (can.
&
Tends machine that grinds nut meats into meal: Turns thumbscrew or handwheels to adjust distance between grinding rollers.
Fills machine hopper with almond meats, and starts machine.
Places container at discharge end of machine to catch emerging nut meal.
Inspects sample of ground nut meal for fineness of grind, and adjusts rollers when necessary to ensure that nut meats are ground to specifications.
May start vacuum hose to remove foreign matter from nut meats.
May be designated according to type of nut ground as Almond Grinder (can.
&
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-238 NUT-SORTER OPERATOR (can.
&
Tends machine that separates whole nut meats from those that are chipped, broken, or wormy: Turns dials to specified settings to separate nut meats.
Connects calibrator to dials to verify settings.
Starts machine and observes rejected nut meats to ascertain whether machine is functioning efficiently.
Examines dial settings of machine periodically, using calibrator, and adjusts dials when necessary.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
521.685-242 OILSEED-MEAT PRESSER (oils 
Tends hydraulic press that extracts oil from cloth-covered cakes of oilseed meat: Lifts cakes from cake-forming tray, using metal pan (blade), shoves cakes into compartments of press, and withdraws empty pan.
Turns handwheel to raise hydraulic ram that presses cakes to extract oil from cake.
GOE: 06.04.19 STRENGTH: M GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-246 PEANUT BLANCHER (can.
&
Tends blanching machine that removes skins from shelled peanuts: Starts machine and pours peanuts into machine hopper.
Inspects peanuts as they fall from machine onto moving belt and picks out foreign matter, unblanched peanuts, and peanuts that fail to meet production specifications.
May sack blanched peanuts [PACKAGER, HAND (any industry)].
May tend sorting machine that electronically locates and removes unblanched peanuts.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-250 POTATO-PEELING-MACHINE OPERATOR (food prep., nec)
Tends machine that washes and peels potatoes: Loads potatoes into hopper of machine by hand or by use of hoist.
Starts machine and equipment that cuts oversized potatoes in half and conveys potatoes through washing and peeling units.
Observes operation of machine to prevent jamming and ensure that potato skins are removed.
In batch-type machine, adjusts timing device to control stay of potatoes in pot containing abrasive disk.
In continuous-type machine, pushes lever to regulate flow of potatoes over abrasive rollers to control amount of skin removed.
Inspects peeled potatoes, passing on conveyor belt, and discards rotten potatoes.
Cuts up oversized potatoes and removes unsuitable parts, using knife.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-254 PROCESSOR, GRAIN (grain-feed mills) alternate titles: grain cleaner; smutter
Tends grain separating, washing, and scouring machines that remove foreign matter, such as dirt, smut, and rust, from grain preparatory to milling: Adjusts slides in bin spouts and starts elevators to route grain from storage bins to machines.
Turns valves to regulate water temperature and water level in washer, to adjust air suction to remove dust from separators, and to regulate flow of air through drier.
Turns wingnuts to adjust angle of separator screens, according to grain flow and amount of refuse.
Hooks bag under end of screen to catch refuse.
Starts machines to process grain and observes flow entering machines to prevent overloading.
Examines processed grain to verify cleanliness.
Pounds chutes with mallet to dislodge clogged grain.
May tend separating equipment only and be designated Separator Tender (grain-feed mills) I. GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-258 PULP-PRESS TENDER (sugar 
Tends presses and auxiliary equipment that extract water from beet pulp, and mix pulp with molasses to produce animal fodder: Starts conveyors, elevator, and presses.
Places gates on conveyor belts to divert pulp into automatic presses.
Opens valve on molasses tank to mix molasses and pulp.
Adjusts presses, valves, and flow of pulp to obtain pulp and molasses mixture with specified moisture content.
Takes samples of pulp before pressing, and of pulp and molasses mixture for laboratory analysis.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
521.685-262 PULPER TENDER (can.
&
Tends machine that extracts juice, and separates seeds and pulp from fresh and precooked fruits, berries, and tomatoes: Places containers under discharge outlets of pulping machine to receive juice, seeds, and pulp.
Starts equipment to pump or convey material through machines or dumps fruit, berries, or vegetables in machine hopper.
Observes passage of juice flowing from discharge outlet to ensure that juice is free of pulp and seeds.
Removes filled containers from discharge outlets.
Replaces damaged or clogged filter screen, using handtools.
May adjust paddles in machine, using wrench.
May add measured amounts of salt to tomato juice.
May heat berries in open kettle prior to processing in pulping machine.
May clean and sterilize machine, using steam hose.
May be designated according to product pulped as Tomato-Pulper Operator (can.
&
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-266 PULVERIZER (meat products)
Tends grinding mill that grinds dried flake albumen into granules: Starts grinder mill and opens chute gate on machine hopper to direct flake albumen between grinder rolls.
Fills hopper with flake albumen, using scoop.
Examines granules and adjusts machine roller settings as required, using handtools, to ensure albumen is ground to specified size.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-270 RIDDLER OPERATOR (tobacco) alternate titles: tobacco cleaner; tobacco-sieve operator
Tends screening device (riddle) to separate coarse pieces of tobacco from cut tobacco: Starts riddle and observes conveyor feeding tobacco into riddle from cutting machine.
Scrapes off coarse tobacco left on flat screen and returns tobacco to cutting machine.
Replaces filled boxes of sifted tobacco with empty boxes.
May brush tobacco from clogged screens.
May be designated according to type of tobacco processed as Granulated-Tobacco Screener (tobacco); Shorts Sifter (tobacco); Tobacco-Scrap Sifter (tobacco).
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-274 ROUGH-RICE TENDER (grain-feed mills)
Tends battery of machines that mill and brush cleaned rough rice: Starts machines, such as shelling stones, rice hullers, paddy separator, and rice brush.
Turns feed controls to regulate flow of rice into series of machines that automatically hull rice, separate hulled from unhulled rice, brush dust from hulled rice, and blow off bran.
Examines rice visually and tactually, and adjusts machines to ensure standard product.
Inspects machines to ensure efficient milling.
Lubricates machines and makes minor repairs.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
521.685-278 ROUTING-EQUIPMENT TENDER (grain-feed mills)
Tends equipment that routes rice to milling machines: Opens feed pipes to route rice for each lot to designated milling machines.
Turns wheels, bolts, and moves levers to adjust grading machines to obtain specified proportions of broken and whole grain rice in lot being milled.
Performs maintenance on mill machinery.
GOE: 06.04.40 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M2 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
521.685-282 SCREEN-ROOM OPERATOR (sugar 
Tends machines that separate sugar crystals, according to grain size: Observes machine vibrating screens to ascertain that sugar is flowing.
Cleans screens with brush and regulates vibrations of screens to maintain flow.
Changes screens by disconnecting sleeves, removing wing nuts, and hoisting cover, using block and tackle.
Takes sample of screened sugar for laboratory analysis.
Tightens machine parts loosened by vibration, using handtools.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
521.685-286 SEPARATOR OPERATOR, SHELLFISH MEATS (can.
&
Tends machine that separates shell particles and sand from shellfish meats, by water and air agitation, preparatory to blanching and canning or freezing: Turns valves to admit water and air to separator vat as shelled meats are dumped into it from peeling machine or by another worker.
Adjusts air volume and operating time according to bulk and cleanliness of meats in vat.
Moves floating meats to conveyor by hand, or by using wooden paddle.
Drains vat to remove shells and sand from bottom.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-290 SEPARATOR TENDER II (grain-feed mills)
Tends reels or shakers that separate and remove bran, gluten, or other insolubles from starch suspension: Starts reels or shakers.
Turns valves to admit and regulate flow of liquid suspension to separators.
Starts conveyor that carries off insolubles separated from suspension.
Tests specific gravity of liquid starch to ascertain if separation meets standards, using hydrometer.
Cleans shakers or reels with caustic solution and water hose.
Replaces worn or broken bearings, springs, and other parts, using handtools.
May tend driers to dehydrate brans.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
521.685-294 SHELLER II (can.
&
Tends nut-cracking machine that cracks shells of nuts and separates broken shells from nut meat: Starts machine and turns handwheels to adjust cylinders or rollers and control flow of nuts into machine.
Observes cracked nuts emerging from machine to ascertain that they are cracked and separated from shells.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-298 SLICE-PLUG-CUTTER OPERATOR (tobacco) alternate titles: cheese cutter; slice-cutting-machine operator; tobacco cutter
Tends slicing machine that cuts plugs (cheeses) of tobacco into slice-plug smoking tobacco: Arranges plugs in even piles on cutting board.
Starts machine and tightens setscrew to feed plugs under reciprocating knife.
Holds cut slices together in form of plugs from which slices are cut, using stick.
Slides sliced tobacco onto tray.
Replaces dull knife blade, using wrench.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-302 SLICING-MACHINE OPERATOR (bakery products)
Tends machine that slices bread, cakes, and other bakery products: Positions and tightens cutting blades and adjusts guides to accommodate size of product to be sliced, using wrench.
Starts machine.
Places product on conveyor and monitors slicing action of machine.
Removes sliced products from machine conveyor and places them on conveyor leading to wrappers.
May tend machines that wrap and pack bakery products [PACKAGER, MACHINE (any industry) 920.685-078].
May be designated according to machine tended as Band-Saw Operator, Cake Cutting (bakery products); or according to product sliced as Bread Slicer, Machine (bakery products); Cake Cutter, Machine (bakery products); Wafer Cutter (bakery products).
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 78
521.685-306 SLICING-MACHINE OPERATOR (dairy products; meat products)
Tends one or more machines that automatically slice food products, such as cheese or meat for packaging: Threads roll of interleaf paper into machine.
Turns screws to adjust guides on machine for size of food slab, using wrench.
Places slab of food on feeder bed.
Presses levers to clamp chunk to bed and start feeder.
Turns dials to set number and thickness of slices in each stack.
Presses switch to start rotating slicer with synchronized devices that cut, count, interleaf, and stack slices of food.
Weighs stack and turns dial to regulate thickness of slices to achieve prescribed weight.
Removes and replaces imperfect slice with one from spare pile.
Places sliced stack on packaging conveyor.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-310 SMOKING-TOBACCO-CUTTER OPERATOR (tobacco) alternate titles: tobacco cutter
Tends machine that cuts cakes of pressed tobacco (cheeses), into granular form for smoking tobacco: Places cake of tobacco on bed of machine and pushes cake between corrugated feed rollers.
Catches cut tobacco on tray and feeds ends of slices between rollers, keeping slices in line.
Changes dull knife blades, using wrench.
Cleans machine, using steam hose.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-314 SNUFF GRINDER AND SCREENER (tobacco)
Tends machines that pulverize chopped tobacco into snuff and sift snuff through screens to remove oversized particles: Presses button to start hammer mill and observes operation of machine to ensure that tobacco is being pulverized into snuff, according to company specifications.
Pushes lever to start screener vibrating to sift pulverized snuff.
Picks up and rubs handful of snuff between hands to verify that oversized particles have been removed.
Adjusts hammer mill or changes filter on screener as needed, using handtools.
Observes flow of snuff through screw-type conveyor to ensure that sufficient amount of snuff is fed to packing machine from screener.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 4 DLU: 77
521.685-318 SORTING-MACHINE OPERATOR (can.
&
Tends automatic-sorting machine that separates fruits, vegetables, shrimp, or pickles, according to sizes: Places baskets, tubs, or crates beneath discharge outlets of machine.
Starts machine and dumps boxes of fruit or vegetables in feed chute or opens supply chute to feed material into machine.
Removes full containers from discharge outlets and replaces them with empty ones.
Cleans, oils, and greases machine, using oilcan or grease gun.
May post identifying information on containers.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-322 SPICE CLEANER (food prep., nec)
Tends machine that removes foreign matter, such as rocks, mold, and insects, from spices: Dumps spices into machine hopper.
Attaches empty bag to discharge end of machine and starts machine.
Inspects cleaned spices to verify that foreign matter is removed.
May sew ends of filled bags, using power-sewing machine.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-326 SPICE MILLER (food prep., nec) alternate titles: spice grinder; spice-grinding-mill operator
Tends machines that grind spices, such as cinnamon and chili pepper: Opens storage hopper gate to fill hammer or rolling-type grinding mill with spice.
Moves lever to control spice feed and places containers under sifting screen or discharge spout.
Examines crushed spices to verify consistency of grind.
Cleans or replaces rollers, sifters, and other machine parts.
May be designated according to spice ground as Chili-Pepper Grinder (food prep., nec); Cinnamon Grinder (food prep., nec); or according to type of grinding machine tended as Spice Miller, Hammer Mill (food prep., nec); Spice Miller, Rolling Mill (food prep., nec).
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
521.685-330 STEM-ROLLER-OR-CRUSHER OPERATOR (tobacco) alternate titles: crusher operator; roller operator
Tends machine that flattens tobacco stems or stems and veins of tobacco leaves: Starts conveyor that feeds tobacco to rollers of machine and forks tobacco onto conveyor.
Regulates flow of steam and water to moisten tobacco and clean and cool rollers.
May remove flattened leaves from machine and stack leaves in pile or fork flattened stems into hogsheads.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-334 STEMMER, MACHINE (tobacco) alternate titles: stripping-and-booking-machine operator; tobacco stemmer, machine; tobacco-stripping-machine operator; wrapper-stemmer operator
Tends machine that removes stems from leaves of tobacco and arranges stemmed leaves into books: Starts machine and feeds leaf between rollers.
Removes stacks of stripped leaves and ties leaves together.
Separates leaves according to books of right or left halves.
Dumps stems from machine into cans.
May be designated according to type of tobacco stemmed as Binder Stripper, Machine (tobacco); Wrapper Stripper (tobacco).
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-338 STRIP-CUTTING-MACHINE OPERATOR (tobacco) alternate titles: shredding-machine operator; tobacco cutter
Tends machine that cuts tobacco into shreds for use in making cigarettes: Starts feeders, ordering drum, conveyors, and cutting machine.
Observes operation of conveyors and cutting machine and pulls lever to regulate flow of tobacco on conveyor to prevent jamming.
May tighten bolts that hold knives, or may change knives, using wrench and screwdriver, and maintain record of knives used.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-342 STRIPPER-CUTTER, MACHINE (food prep., nec) alternate titles: sawyer
Tends machines equipped with guillotine knives or bandsaw, stick pusher, and deheader, that automatically strip, dehead, and cut macaroni long goods to specified length: Starts elevator to position rack of dried macaroni beside machine.
Pulls machine arm that lifts drying stick (rod) of macaroni from rack onto chain conveyor that feeds it onto machine bed.
Starts deheading hammer, stick pusher, and knives, and feeds macaroni onto packaging conveyor.
Starts machine that automatically strips and dehooks macaroni, and passes it through preset bandsaw to cut product into specified lengths for packaging.
Removes cut macaroni from trough and places in box on packaging conveyor line.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-346 SUGAR GRINDER (sugar 
Tends machine that grinds granulated sugar into powdered sugar: Turns handwheel to set spacing between grinding rollers or stones, or installs gratings in drum of grinding machine to obtain specified degree of fineness.
Starts machine and empties bags of granulated sugar into hopper.
Observes grinding and discharging process to verify pulverization of sugar to specified fineness and discharge of sugar through air-leg into bags.
Removes filled bags from air-leg onto pallet and replaces them with empty bags.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
521.685-350 SUGAR PRESSER (grain-feed mills)
Tends press that removes corn-sugar hydrol from crystallized cakes of sugar.
Places cakes in press and turns handwheels to compress cakes and squeeze out hydrol.
Releases pressure and removes slabs.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-354 SUGAR-CHIPPER-MACHINE OPERATOR (grain-feed mills) alternate titles: sugar grinder
Tends machine that chips cakes of sugar into pieces: Lifts cakes of sugar onto table of machine having rotating wheel equipped with knives.
Starts machine and pushes sugar cakes against wheel that chips cakes into pieces.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-358 SWEET-POTATO DISINTEGRATOR (can.
&
Tends machine that grinds sweet potatoes into semifluid state to facilitate cooking process: Starts machine and turns handwheel to admit water into discharge chute of conveyor and into machine to lubricate potatoes during grinding process.
Starts conveyor that moves potatoes from hopper into chute feeding grinding machine.
Observes level of semifluid potatoes fed into receptacle and stops grinding process when receptacle is full.
Clears potato jam-ups on conveyor, using rod.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-362 THRESHING-MACHINE OPERATOR (tobacco) alternate titles: stem-cleaning-machine feeder; stem-threshing-machine operator
Tends threshing machine that strips leaf particles from tobacco stems: Starts motor that rotates spike-studded drums or vibrates screen.
Forks dried stems onto feed conveyor or opens chute gate to drop tobacco onto feed conveyor.
Removes filled catching bag, empties bag into bin or sack, and replaces bag on machine.
Removes matted stems from spikes of drum.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-366 TIPPLE TENDER (grain-feed mills)
Tends tipple to dump casings loaded with dried corn starch onto conveyor: Lowers casing into tipple, using hoist.
Turns handwheel to dump starch into hopper above moving conveyor, and opens hopper gate to deposit starch uniformly on conveyor.
GOE: 06.04.40 STRENGTH: H GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-370 WINERY WORKER (beverage)
Performs any combination of following tasks involved in winemaking: Lifts bulk grapes or dried pomace onto conveyor leading to crusher, disintegrator, or de-alcoholizer still, using pitchfork.
Connects portable pumps between tanks and turns valves to pump wine and alcohol from fermenting and fortifying tanks to tanks that cool wine to prevent further fermentation.
Pumps chilled wine into clarifying tanks and adds prescribed chemicals to wine.
Starts agitator that mixes solution to induce sedimentation of wine particles.
Pumps clarified wines through filtering tanks into tank to obtain blended wine.
Pumps wine through pasteurizer to prevent wine spoilage.
Pumps pasteurized wine through filtering device to collect sediment and precipitates and into tanks in bottling room.
Tends press that separates juice from pomace and starts conveyor that transports pomace to disintegrating machine.
Starts disintegrating machine and de-alcoholizer steam still that salvages alcohol from pomace, and starts conveyor that transports residue to storage.
Cleans and sterilizes fermenting and fortifying tanks and railroad tank cars, using airhose and soda ash.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R3 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
521.685-374 WINTERIZER (oils 
Tends equipment that strains stearin from vegetable oils, such as soybean, corn, and cottonseed to produce salad oil: Turns valves to admit oil to chilling tank and to circulate refrigerant through tank coils for specified time to solidify stearin.
Opens filter valves and adjusts air pressure to force oil through filters and trap suspended stearin.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.685-378 DEBONER, PET FOOD (can.
&
Tends deboning-grinder machine that separates flesh from bones to make boneless ground pet food: Positions and secures hopper, screw, and disk assemblies in deboning-grinder machine housings, using wrench, and depresses buttons to activate machine and conveyor.
Observes volume of meat parts moving on conveyor into hopper, and adds or removes parts, using shovel, and spreads parts in hopper, using stick, to ensure steady supply of parts to machine.
Picks bones and similar matter from parts on conveyor to assist in separating process.
Observes processing and adjusts disk assembly when required to maintain specified consistency and volume of ground parts, using ratchet lever.
Shovels separated bones and foreign matter into disposal drum.
Cleans machine and work area, using hose, brush, and shovel.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L2 SVP: 2 DLU: 86
521.685-382 FLAVORING OIL FILTERER (beverage)
Tends filtering equipment that removes wax from citrus oil used to make flavoring: Selects formula card according to work order specifications and pours oil and other ingredients into mixing tank.
Inserts clean filter pad into filter pump and attaches hoses from mixing tank to filter in prescribed order.
Depresses button to activate pump that moves mixture from mixing tank through filtering mechanism to filter and clarify oil.
Opens valve of holding tank to collect sample of filtered oil and refilters oil when sample does not meet clarity and color standards.
At end of processing, opens valve of holding tank to draw filtered oil into containers.
Maintains records of kinds and quantities of materials used and amount of oil processed.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M1 L2 SVP: 4 DLU: 86
521.685-386 SCALING MACHINE OPERATOR (can.
&
Tends machine that removes scales from fish: Turns valve to start spray of water over spiked rollers of scaling machine.
Pushes buttons to start and stop conveyor that feeds fish from holding tank into tray at feeding end of machine and to start scaling machine.
Feeds fish onto conveyor that moves fish through spiked rollers that remove scales from sides of fish and that dumps fish into containers.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 86
521.686-010 BOLTER HELPER (grain-feed mills)
Assists BOLTER (grain-feed mills) in tending flour sifting and purifying machines: Opens slides in chutes and starts elevators to route flour between sifters, purifiers, and grinding machines.
Observes flour to ensure flow through specified chutes and machines.
Pounds on chutes with mallet to keep flour flowing.
Brushes cloth sieves in sifters and purifiers to prevent clogging.
May adjust flow of water onto belt to temper grain for milling.
Performs other duties as described under HELPER (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.686-014 CAKE PULLER (oils 
Removes cottonseed cakes from hydraulic presses after extraction of oil: Pulls lever or turns handwheel to release pressure on ram.
Knocks cake loose and moves it to edge of press, using metal rod.
Places cakes on table for removal of press cloth.
GOE: 06.04.19 STRENGTH: H GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.686-018 CHICLE-GRINDER FEEDER (sugar 
Feeds chicle and gum bases into grinding machine, preparatory to making chewing gum: Loads blocks of chicle or other gum bases onto conveyor of grinding machine, using electric hoist or lift truck.
Starts machine and places empty containers under discharge spout to catch ground ingredients.
Shovels ground material into barrels on platform scale until specified weight is obtained.
May dump salvage gum into grinding machine and be designated Salvage Grinder (sugar 
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.686-022 COTTON PULLER (oils 
Removes rolls of linters (cotton lint cleaned from cottonseed) from takeup rolls of linter machine.
Places empty roll onto brackets of machine and threads end of material onto roll.
Moves rolls of linters to baling room, using handtruck.
GOE: 06.04.19 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 1 DLU: 77
521.686-026 CUSTOM-FEED-MILL-OPERATOR HELPER (grain-feed mills)
Assists CUSTOM-FEED-MILL OPERATOR (grain-feed mills) in milling grain and feed to customer specifications.
Sacks mill products, loads them on truck, and delivers products to customer.
Performs other duties as described under HELPER (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.686-030 CUT-IN WORKER (grain-feed mills)
Opens sacks of rough (uncleaned) rice, using knife, and empties rice into hopper, preparatory to cleaning and storing of rice in bins.
Piles empty sacks on handtruck and removes sacks to warehouse.
GOE: 06.04.40 STRENGTH: H GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 1 DLU: 77
521.686-034 FISH-MACHINE FEEDER (can.
&
Feeds cleaned fish into machines that bone, skin, or cut and pack fish sections into can: Inspects fish to ensure that color, odor, and texture meet standards.
Places fish on feed conveyor of machine.
May start machines and pull levers to regulate feed conveyor speed.
May be designated according to machine fed as Filling-Machine Feeder (can.
&
&
&
&
&
&
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.686-038 FLUMER (grain-feed mills)
Feeds potatoes into flume (trough) that carries them to washing machine: Removes board covering flume to allow potatoes to fall from stockpile.
Scoops potatoes from edges of pile, using wheelbarrow, and dumps them into flume.
Adjusts headgates to regulate flow of potatoes into flume.
GOE: 06.04.39 STRENGTH: M GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 1 DLU: 77
521.686-042 FLUMER II (sugar 
Fills flumes (troughs) with sugar beets, performing any combination of following duties: Trips lever on gondola loaded with beets, or removes sideboards on storage bin allowing beets to spill into flume.
Prods beets with bar to maintain continuous flow of beets.
Washes gondola or storage bin, using water hose.
Dumps truckloads of beets into hopper and feeds beets onto conveyor leading to flume or storage bins.
Removes leaves, stems, and trash from flume, using shovel or pitchfork.
Loads rocks extracted from flume onto dump truck.
GOE: 06.04.39 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 1 DLU: 77
521.686-046 NUT CHOPPER (can.
&
Feeds machine that chops nuts: Places container under discharge outlet of chopping machine, scoops nuts into hopper of machine and starts machine.
Empties container of chopped nuts as they emerge from machine into trays, sacks, or containers for further processing.
May place trays of nuts in steam cabinet for softening, and slice nuts, using slicing machine.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.686-050 PROCESSOR HELPER (grain-feed mills)
Assists PROCESSOR, GRAIN (grain-feed mills) in tending machines and equipment that clean, scour, and separate grain.
Regulates flow of grain to machines.
Relieves stoppages.
Adjusts machines.
Performs other duties as described under HELPER (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: H GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.686-054 SLICE-PLUG-CUTTER-OPERATOR HELPER (tobacco) alternate titles: slice-cutting-machine-operator helper
Assists SLICE-PLUG-CUTTER OPERATOR (tobacco) to cut plugs of tobacco (cheeses), into slice-plug smoking tobacco.
Performs other duties as described under HELPER (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.687-010 ALMOND BLANCHER, HAND (can.
&
Observes blanched (skinned) almonds on conveyor belt emerging from blanching machine and removes almonds with skins missed by machine.
Rubs or squeezes almonds between fingers to remove skins.
May rub or squeeze skins from almonds that have been immersed in hot water and dumped into trays.
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: S GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 1 DLU: 77
521.687-014 BINDER CUTTER, HAND (tobacco) alternate titles: filler-leaf cutter, long
Cuts leaf tobacco used to bind bunches to specified size.
Places tobacco leaf on cutting table against guides and lowers knife blade to cut leaf.
Moves guides to obtain cut of specific size.
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.687-018 BINDER SELECTOR (tobacco) alternate titles: binder sorter
Inspects leaves of tobacco before and after stripping to determine whether leaves are suitable for use as binders: Inspects each leaf for holes and tears.
Places leaves to be used as binders in bundle for stripping and discards defective leaves.
Removes defective leaves from books and places books of perfect leaves in container.
May sprinkle water on books that appear dry.
GOE: 06.03.02 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.687-022 BONE PICKER (can.
&
Examines shellfish meats under ultraviolet light and removes pieces of shell, preparatory to canning: Places tray of shelled meats on table, or observes meats passing on conveyor under ultraviolet generators that cause shell particles to glow.
Turns and stirs meats by hand to view all sides and picks out and discards bits of shell, viscera, and foreign matter.
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 1 DLU: 77
521.687-026 BUNCH TRIMMER, MOLD (tobacco)
Draws knife along ends of cigar molds to cut off excess tobacco protruding from molds.
Loads trimmed molds onto truck for removal to rolling department.
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 1 DLU: 77
521.687-030 CHAR PULLER (grain-feed mills; sugar 
Removes contaminated char (activated carbon) from corn syrup filters for reclaiming: Positions receiving platform at discharge gate of filter to unload used char.
Removes nuts to open discharge gate, using wrench.
Loosens and pulls char onto receiving platform and into chute to conveyor.
Sweeps filters to remove remaining char.
Arranges and smooths blankets that cover bottom plates of filter.
Replaces gate and tightens nuts evenly to prevent warp and leakage.
Cleans char from platform and floor.
GOE: 06.04.39 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.687-034 CHAR-FILTER-OPERATOR HELPER (sugar 
Prepares char filter tanks for sugar-liquor filtration: Attaches hoses between filters and manifold, using wrenches.
Removes filter covers, using block and tackle.
Positions char chutes and starts conveyors to fill empty filters.
Attaches hose from manifold to weir box for mixing liquor with char while filling.
Covers filters after filling.
Opens air vents to purge air from filled filters.
Cleans hoses and drip pans.
GOE: 06.04.39 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
521.687-038 DRIP-BOX TENDER (grain-feed mills)
Positions spout of portable tank containing starch solution over series of boxes lined with cloth and opens valve to fill each box.
Inverts boxes after water has drained through cloth to remove solid starch cakes, or scoops out starch with shovel, and places product on handtruck for transfer to kiln.
May move levers controlling flow of starch into steel casings and hang casings on hooks of overhead conveyor leading to kiln and be designated Starch Presser (grain-feed mills).
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 1 DLU: 77
521.687-042 EGG BREAKER (any industry)
Separates yolk and glair (white) of eggs for use in food products: Strikes eggs against bar, allows contents to fall into bowl, and throws empty shells into receptacle.
Smells broken eggs to detect spoiled ones and dumps them into waste container.
Pours broken eggs from bowl over egg-separating device.
Pulls lever to retain yolk and to allow white to fall into cup below.
May be designated according to specialization as Egg Smeller (any industry).
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.687-046 FILLER SPREADER (tobacco)
Separates individual leaves from pads of tobacco leaves pressed together in shipping.
Arranges leaves in rows on screen racks.
Assists other workers in carrying and lifting screen racks to storage racks.
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: M GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 1 DLU: 77
521.687-050 FILTER CHANGER (beverage)
Replaces soiled filter cakes in beer filter, using handtools.
Disassembles filter press and separates plates (frames) to remove old filter pads.
Positions clean cakes between plates and reassembles filter.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.687-054 FILTER-SCREEN CLEANER (beverage)
Cleans filter screens used in diatomaceous-silica filtering machine: Disassembles screens from frame by hand or using wrenches.
Flushes residue from screens with water hose or immerses and boils screens in tanks of boiling water.
Cleans and reassembles screens and frames, using brushes and handtools.
Cleans working area and equipment, using mops and brooms.
GOE: 06.04.39 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.687-058 FISH CHOPPER, GANG KNIFE (can.
&
Positions fish on cutting table and pulls $T3gang knife$T1 handle to cut fish into several lengths for packing into cans.
May load and distribute trays of cut fish to packers.
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: M GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.687-062 FISH-LIVER SORTER (can.
&
Sorts fish livers, according to species of fish and size, shape, color, and texture of liver: Cuts liver from viscera, using knife, and places liver in specified tub.
Discards diseased, spoiled, and poor quality livers.
May clean and fillet fish [FISH CLEANER (can.
&
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.687-066 FRUIT CUTTER (sugar 
Cuts dried, fresh, candied, or crystallized fruit into cubes or pieces for candy fillings and for garnishing iced candies, using knife.
When opening, pitting, and chopping dates, is designated Date Puller (sugar 
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 1 DLU: 77
521.687-070 HONEYCOMB DECAPPER (food prep., nec) alternate titles: comb capper
Cuts caps from commercial honeycombs with hand or motor-driven knife, preparatory to extracting honey: Breaks propolis (beeglue) seals with scraper, and lifts frame of honeycomb from super.
Moves honeycomb frame into oscillating knife, or cuts caps from frame, using hand knife.
Trims superfluous wax from wooden parts with knife and places frame in stand.
May place frames of honeycomb in extractor [HONEY EXTRACTOR (food prep., nec)].
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
521.687-074 LABORER, SYRUP MACHINE (grain-feed mills)
Collects rejected cans of corn syrup and pours contents into strainer that removes impurities.
Cleans work area and reservoir of filling machines, using water, brushes, and mop.
Carries cans and supplies to machines.
GOE: 06.04.39 STRENGTH: H GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 1 DLU: 77
521.687-078 LIQUOR-BRIDGE-OPERATOR HELPER (sugar 
Routes flow of wash water from char filter as directed by LIQUOR-BRIDGE OPERATOR (sugar 
Ties clean pockets on filter discharge nipple to prevent splashing in weir boxes.
Changes weir boxes to divert flow of sweetwater (wash water from filter containing sugar) or waste water to specified tanks or bays, noting changes on filter record board.
Tests water for density to ascertain sugar content, using hydrometer.
Bottles samples of liquor and sweetwater for laboratory analysis.
Washes weir boxes and keeps work station in sanitary condition.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
521.687-082 MILLER HELPER, DISTILLERY (beverage) alternate titles: grain-miller helper
Assists MILLER, DISTILLERY (beverage) to clean and grind grain into meal for use in distillation of distilled liquors: Adjusts grain and meal discharge chutes on storage tanks.
Removes covers from storage tanks to admit grain and meal.
Changes vibrating screens on cleaning machines, using handtools.
Places empty grain sacks over discharge ends of cleaning machines to collect dust and refuse.
Assists MILLER, DISTILLERY (beverage) to make minor repairs to pumps, air-conveyor chutes, and machines.
Performs other duties as described under HELPER (any industry) Master Title.
GOE: 06.04.15 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
521.687-086 NUT SORTER (can.
&
Removes defective nuts and foreign matter from bulk nut meats: Observes nut meats on conveyor belt, and picks out broken, shriveled, or wormy nuts and foreign matter, such as leaves and rocks.
Places defective nuts and foreign matter into containers.
May be designated according to kind of nut meat sorted as Almond Sorter (can.
&
&
GOE: 06.03.02 STRENGTH: S GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.687-090 NUT STEAMER (can.
&
Immerses nuts in hot water to soften shells to facilitate shelling process: Turns valve to fill vat or kettle with water.
Starts heaters and sets temperature gauge to maintain required temperature.
Places nuts, such as almonds, pecans, or walnuts, into wire basket, and lowers basket into vat of hot water, using hoist.
Removes basket from vat after specified time.
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.687-094 PEELED-POTATO INSPECTOR (food prep., nec) alternate titles: potato spotter
Inspects peeled potatoes, passing on conveyor belt.
Picks out rotten potatoes.
Cuts out unsuitable parts and halves over-sized potatoes, using knife.
GOE: 06.03.02 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.687-098 PICKER (tobacco) alternate titles: lamina searcher; scrap picker; searcher
Removes stems, offcolor tobacco, and foreign material, such as strings, dirt, and paper from tobacco as it moves along conveyor to ensure clean and uniform product.
May drop pickings into bags attached to conveyor frame, according to whether pickings are dark tobacco, green tobacco, tobacco with stems, or foreign material.
May be designated according to type of tobacco processed as Filler Picker (tobacco); Scrap Sorter (tobacco).
GOE: 06.03.02 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.687-102 PICKING-TABLE WORKER (sugar 
Picks stems, stones, metal, or wood not eliminated by trash-picking machine from conveyor to prevent damage to beet knives.
May trim tops from beets to prevent clogging of knives in slicers.
GOE: 06.03.02 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 1 DLU: 77
521.687-106 SAUSAGE-MEAT TRIMMER (meat products) alternate titles: beef trimmer; lard trimmer; piece-meat trimmer; piece trimmer; retrimmer
Prepares meat for use in making ground and smoked meat products, such as sausage and bologna: Obtains specified meat from stock and carries to cutting table.
Cuts and trims meat from bone and dices meat, using knife, cleaver, and bandsaw.
Weighs meat on platform scale and places in tubs.
Tags each tub for weight and contents.
May grind meat.
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: H GED: R2 M2 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.687-110 SHAKER (tobacco) alternate titles: bundle shaker; filler opener; filler shaker; hand shaker; tobacco shaker
Shakes hands of cured tobacco to separate, straighten, and expose leaves to air and remove dirt.
Places loosened tobacco on table or conveyor for further processing.
May be designated according to type of leaf processed as Frog Shaker (tobacco); Wrapper Opener (tobacco).
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 1 DLU: 77
521.687-114 SHAKER WASHER (grain-feed mills)
Flushes shaker tables and reel panels, using hose, to remove material that clogs mesh and prevents effective separation of starch from bran and gluten.
Sponges and rinses back of fabric with detergent solution and water.
Removes and installs repaired frames, using wrench and screwdriver, under direction of SHAKER REPAIRER (grain-feed mills).
GOE: 06.04.39 STRENGTH: M GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.687-118 SHELLER I (can.
&
Cracks nuts, such as pecans, brazil nuts, and walnuts, using vise.
Picks out nut meats and drops meat in container.
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 1 DLU: 77
521.687-122 SHELLFISH SHUCKER (can.
&
Shucks fresh or steamed shellfish, such as oysters, clams, or scallops (bivalves), preparatory to canning, freezing, or fresh packing: Holds shellfish firmly or against block and forces shucking knife between halves of shell at hinge juncture.
Twists knife to sever muscles holding shell closed and pries open.
Cuts shellfish from shell, flips it into container, and discards shell.
May break off edges of shells before shucking, using hatchet.
May be designated according to shellfish shucked as Clam Shucker (can.
&
&
&
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: L GED: R2 M1 L1 SVP: 3 DLU: 77
521.687-126 SKIN LIFTER, BACON (meat products)
Cuts slit in flank end of bacon slab between meat and skin, using knife, so that slab may be inserted into derinding machine.
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: M GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 1 DLU: 77
521.687-130 SKULL GRINDER (meat products) alternate titles: head-bone grinder; turbinated-bone grinder
Picks up split and brained hog head and holds nasal passages against revolving emery wheel to clean out dirt.
Removes dirt from ear passages.
Throws hog head in container.
GOE: 06.04.39 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.687-134 STEMMER, HAND (tobacco) alternate titles: filler stemmer, hand; leaf stemmer, hand; sprigger; tobacco stripper, hand; wrapper stemmer, hand
Removes stems from tobacco leaves to prepare tobacco for use as filler, binder, or wrapper for cigars, plug, or twist chewing tobacco: Strips leaf from stem, starting at tip end of leaf.
Spreads and stacks wrapper leaves in piles, keeping leaves separated into left- and right-hand books.
Places filler tobacco and stems in box or can.
May be designated according to tobacco stripped as Binder Stripper, Hand (tobacco); Scrap Stripper, Hand (tobacco); Wrapper Stripper, Hand (tobacco).
GOE: 06.04.28 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
521.687-138 TABLE HAND (tobacco)
Forks tobacco from bin onto cutting-machine supply table to supply SMOKING-TOBACCO-CUTTER OPERATOR (tobacco).
GOE: 06.04.40 STRENGTH: L GED: R1 M1 L1 SVP: 2 DLU: 77
522 CULTURING, MELTING, FERMENTING, DISTILLING, SATURATING, PICKLING, AGING, AND RELATED OCCUPATIONS
This group includes occupations concerned with growing bacteria or other microorganisms in materials; liquefying solid materials by means of heat; breaking down complex molecules in organic compounds by the introduction of a ferment such as yeast; heating a mixture to separate the more volatile from the less volatile parts and then cooling and condensing the resulting vapor to produce a nearly pure or refined substance; soaking thoroughly, filling, charging, or treating a substance with another so that no more can be taken up; preserving and flavoring materials or products by immersing, coating, or injecting them with preservatives; and subjecting materials or products to the effects of time.
522.130-010 SUPERVISOR, MELT HOUSE (sugar 
Supervises and coordinates activities of workers engaged in washing, centrifuging, and melting bulk raw sugar: Reads production schedule and consults with SUPERVISOR, FILTRATION (sugar 
Calculates melting rates of raw sugar, using standard formula.
Moves controls to set timing cycles on centrifuges and start machinery, such as elevators, scrolls, and pumps.
Inspects process stations to verify that equipment and machinery are operating as specified.
Performs other duties as described under SUPERVISOR (any industry) Master Title.
May supervise workers engaged in reclaiming contaminated sugars and syrups and be designated Supervisor, Remelt (sugar 
GOE: 06.01.01 STRENGTH: L GED: R4 M3 L3 SVP: 7 DLU: 77
522.131-010 DISTILLING-DEPARTMENT SUPERVISOR (beverage)
